SCARLET FEATHER.
CHAPTER I
The Lodge.
The
young chieftain
Natanis
stood in front of his hunting-lodge leaning
upon his bow. Tall and noble in person, and in his attitude commanding,
yet graceful, he looked like a young Apollo just returned from the chase.
At his feet lay a doe with a freshly oozing wound in her soft white breast,
and upon the ground by his side crouched, panting, a huge black wolf-dog.
The bronzed chest and right arm of the young Indian were naked. A
panther's skin hung negligently from his left shoulder in massive folds. He
had slain the fine animal without weapon, as Samson had overpowered the
lion, and with a vanity pardonable in a young and handsome chief, wore
his skin as a trophy of his exploit. Beneath this shaggy toga was visible a
buff-coloured hunting-shirt of dressed deer's hide, girdled at the waist by a
gorgeously embroidered belt of wampum. In this belt he carried a long
French dagger with a silver handle and sheath of the same metal. His
leggins
were also of deer's skin, died scarlet and fringed with bead-work in a
very curious and beautiful manner. Upon his feet he wore moccasins,
elaborately
wrought with beads of the richest tints in representations of birds
or stags in flight pursued by winged arrows.
At his back was slung a quiver, containing, at this time, a single arrow.
The quiver was made of the silvery bark of the birch tree, and ornamented
with divers pictorial figures, beautifully colored, though with rudely-drawn
outlines. Upon his head he wore no covering; but a hand of wampum in
which was delicately worked in parti-colored grasses, his name and warlike
deeds bound his brow, leaving the jet black masses of hair falling free upon
his finely moulded shoulders. From the front of this band towered a bright,
scarlet feather, rising above his lofty forehead from amid a dark eagle's
plumage
that half encircled it like a crescent. This feather was the badge and
insignia of his rank as chief of the powerful Abenaquies; and it also gave
him the designation, by which he was known among warriors, of`The
Scarlet Feather.'
Before him flowed the waters of the romantic Kennebis,
*
*
Now known as the Kennebec.
its dark,
transparent
tide almost bathing his feet and reflecting his stately form. The
river was narrow, and its opposite bank almost overcast with its shadows
the green spot where the cabin of Natanis stood. It was near the close of
a sunny day in October, that season of richness, when Nature, investing
herself with a thousand dyes, mocks even the gorgeous pallete of the
painter.
Natanis gazed silently, as if in admiration, upon the darkly flowing
water
reflecting from its banks foliage of gold, crimson and orange, and upon
the gorgeous forests that clothed the hills and mountains; and from these,
his eye rested in the distance through a gorge of the river hills upon a lofty
peak shining with snow, and thence uplifted, they reposed upon the deep,
still, pure blue of heaven over all.
It was a sweet, secluded spot where the young chieftain had pitched his
hunting lodge; a green, quiet vale upon the river back shut in by pleasant
hills, yet commanding a beautiful and varied prospect. At intervals as he
stood leaning thus upon his bow as if calmly enjoying the scene and the
hour before entering his cabin, the sound of a distant waterfall would come
fitfully and soothingly to his ear. Drawn up on the green sward before
his cabin was a light birch canoe of that graceful shell-shape peculiar to
these barks of the sons of the forest; and by the side of his cabin-door
reclined
the sharp flat paddle and a salmon-spear which he had just before
taken out of it; for he had landed at his lodge from his canoe but a few
moments before. Around the lodge, upon branches cut for the purpose,
hung several skins of deer, stags, and does; and one of a huge black bear,
the glittering tusks being left in the head. Within the lodge were a few
rude implements for preparing food, and upon the ground was thrown a
skin which served the occupant for a couch.
The sun-beams of the closing day had left in shadow the vallies, and
were lingering upon the snowy peak of Mout Bigelow, when Natanis
changed
his position and turned to enter the lodge. Before going in, he sent as
if by habit a quick, searching glance up and down the river. As he did
so, his eye was arrested by a canoe gliding out of the shadows of the bank
below and approaching the lodge. His whole manner was transformed by
the sight, as if by magic. His figure dilated and his dark eyes lighted up
with fire. He seized his yew bow, which was seven feet long, with a firmer
grasp, pressed his knee upon the middle, and strung it till the deer's sinew,
which formed the chord, had the tension of a steel rod. Then drawing
from the quiver his sole remaining arrow, he fitted it to the string, and
throwing
himself at once into an attitude defying, and yet inquiring, he waited
the movements of the canoe. He saw that it contained two persons, and
that they were `pale faces.'
As the boat came within a hundred yards of the lodge, it stopped at the
bank, and one of the men alighted, and waved an Indian
calumet
in token
of his peaceful intentions; at the the same time he placed against a tree a
rifle which he carried, and there leaving it standing, advanced a few paces
unarmed, and stood still, as if awaiting the decision of the young Chief.
Natanis, after surveying him a moment longer, seemed to recognize him,
dropped the head of his arrow, and holding it and the bow together in one
hand, made a dignified motion of the hand for the stranger to approach.
The intruder was a man of extraordinary make, being full six feet and a
half in height, yet as slender as a youth of seventeen, a compound of long
bones and sinews most uncouthly, yet muscularly put together. He wore a
tall, box-skin cap with the tail pointed down his back, a blue, linsey-woolsy
hunting frock, checked trowsers, with half, deer-skin leggins and moccasins.
He carried a knife, sheathed in a leathern case stuck in a belt that had once
been a soldier's, and a sort of haversack of bear-skin was slunk across his
left shoulder and rested upon his hip. His countenance was large featured,
hardy, and stamped with decision and good nature. He had no beard,
his hair was yellow in hue, and worn long and strait over his neck; and his
skin was burned as brown as mahogany.
He walked towards Natanis with enormous strides which seemed his
natural gait.
`There! stand
there!
' commanded the young chief pointing with his bow
to a point about ten paces from him. `What would you, stranger, that you
visit the lodge of Abenaquis?' he enquired with dignity.
`I come as a friend of the Abenaquies,' answered the hunter in the
Tarratine
language with which he had been addressed. `If thou art Natanis,
The Scarlet Feather, I am thy friend.'
`The Abenaquis well knows all his friends. He knoweth not thee! yet,
he suspects who it is that has sought him in his hunting lodge! I have heard
of Ustaloga, called also the Sharp Knife!'
`You guess right, Natanis. I am the hunter you call the Sharp Knife!
If you know me, you know I am the friend of the Abenaquies!'
`I know thou art a great warrior, and art from a child a dweller of the
forest with the tribe of the Kennebis; yet I have never seen thee before.
But I believe thou art a friend to our race.'
`I am more Indian than Christian, Scarlet Feather,' said the hunter
laughing
;
`I never knew my white name, having been taken prisoner by the Chief
Ustaloga, who gave me his own name, and raised me a warrior!'
`You have done great deeds in battle, I hear! I am glad to welcome a
brave man to my lodge. Enter, Ustaloga, and be welcome to my
hospitality
.
Who comes with you? go bring thy brother.'
`'Tis
thy
brother, chief.'
`
My
brother?' repeated Natanis with surprise, and endeavoring to pierce
with his keen eye the foliage which partly hid the companion of the hunter
from his sight.
`It is the Sagamore Sebatis, chief. He delays but to bring with him some
presents for thee!'
`My brother Sabatis?' cried the young Indian warrior, his fine, dark
countenance
illuminated with an expression of pleasure, which the next
moment
passed by, leaving behind a sorrowful expression; for he suddenly
recollected
that when he and his brot er had last parted, it was in coldness.
He therefore restrained the impulse by which he was first moved to hasten
to meet him, and remained where he was, calm and silent, awaiting his
approach
.
The chief, Sabatis, at length advanced towards the lodge, bearing in his
hand a package wrapped in the skiu of an otter. He was a man of large
stature, of great breadth of shoulder, a massive frame, and features bold and
prominent. He wore a blue striped blanket, with a deep fringe, wrapped
round his form, leggings of undressed deer-skin, and a single eagle's feather
tipped with crimson, bound in the masses of his dark locks. He was
older
than Natanis, and with a sterner visage; yet his carriage was marked by
the smae lofty port, and haughtiness of air.
`Welcome, brother,' said Natanis, as the Sagmore came near; and he
advanced
a pace, and stretched forth his hand.
`Natanis, let us meet as brothers;' said the elder, throwing his arms
around him and embracing him. The young chief with frankness and
cordiality
returned the embrace, and the brothers were reconciled!
`Come, brother, let us enter the lodge. I have a doe here, and we will
feast together!'
`No, Natanis, not now. I and Sharp Knife have both eaten. I have
come to see thee on affairs touching thyself and thy greatness. Let us
talk, for we must pursue our journey with the rising of the moon!'
`Whither does the prow of your canoe lead you?'
`Northward! We seek in haste the river's source, and our feet must not
rest until we have crossed the mountains of the wilderness, and our canoe
floats again in the waters that flow north into Lake Megantic.'
`Why this haste? Do you pursue game, brother, you and Sharp Knife,
that you thus follow the trails into the northern wilderness?'
`Listen, brother!' answered the Sagamore Sebatis, after the three had
seated themselves on skins in front of the lodge, Natanis a little removed
from, and facing his guests.
`My ears are open, brother.'
`Three moons ago, Natanis, when I sought you in the midst of your
people
,
and there proposed to you to join with me in taking part with the
English
of Quebec against the pale faces who inhabit our hunting grounds, you
refused.'
`I
did
refuse, Natanis. The English I know not. They are far removed
from us! Their king's lodge is beyond the sea, and his hunting grounds lie
beyond the rising of the sun. What have we to do with giving our arms
and aid to strangers? So I answered thee then, so I answer thee now!'
`And who are these you would take part with? are they not the very
men who invade our hunting grounds, and who press us back from the sea
and the pleasant valleys of the rivers into the wilderness? The English of
Canada have not robbed us of our lands, and they are at war with those who
possess them from the shores of the Kennebis and the Bay of
Massachoiset
to the far south, more than a moon's journey.'
`I know not the English. They are neither my foes nor friends! The
Americans I do know! I know that there are among them men of wisdom
also great warriors! why should I take up the hatchet against them? It is
true they dwell upon lands that our father once hunted over; but those
lands have been sold to them brother! I shall not mix with this war!' he
concluded in a firm tone of voice.
The Sagamore sat silent, and his countenance grew dark after his brother
had ceased. The hunter, seeing that he would soon reply with anger,
hastened
to prevent any quarrels, and said to him,
`Scarlet Feather, noble Sagamore, does not show any hostility to the
English. He will remain neutral at least.'
`I want my brother's arm and warriors,' answered Sebatis sternly and
impatiently
.
`I have given the English the promise of mine, and the braves
of my tribe. Natanis, we are brothers! We are chiefs over brother tribes,
which our father divided between us. Let us not be at enmity. Thy tribe,
numbering eight hundred Abanaquies, and mine of a thousand Tarantine
warriors, will be of great service to the English.'
`And have
you
, brother, sold yourself, and your warriors?! demanded
Natanis
with haughty surprise.
`No! I have only pledged myself as an ally, and to be ready to serve the
English King, whensoever I may be called on!' replied Sebatis with equal
haughtiness.
`What does he give thee, brother, for this service? asked Natanis with
contempt.
`When the war is ended, I am to have restored to my domains by the
English King, the hunting grounds of my fathers, now possessed by the
white-faces, and lying between the Kennebis and Andre-coquin!'
`And this they pledge thee?' pursued Scarlet Feather, his fine, dark face
eloquent with scorn and pity.
`They do. I have the word of the English Sagamore Carlton whom I
saw in Quebec four moons ago!'
`And what is this service required of thee?'
`To be ready to march upon the frontier of Massachoisetts whensoever I
shall receive orders, placing myself under the command of one of their chiefs
to unite with their army against Boston!'
`And is there such a plan?' demanded Natanis starting with surprise.
`The movements of the British I don't fully know. Besides you are their
enemy, brother!' replied Sebatis cautiously, and darting a searching glance
upon him.
Said I, I was their enemy?'
`He did not say so, Sagamore, that is a fact,' said Sharp Knife readily.
`True!'
`Brother!' said Natanis, speaking with enthusiasm, his dark eye kindling
with the fire of scorn and contempt, that was awakened in his generous
bosom
;
`have I been so unhappy as to sit here and listen to such base words
as thou hast given utterance to! Have I heard a son of the warrior
Abanaquis
,
has Natanis heard his brother confess that he has sold his
independence
to the Pale-Face? Shame brother! have you been so dazzled by the
gold of the white man, that dishonor appears to you without a stain? If you
have lost your hunting grounds, are you so craven as to seek their
restoration
by the aid of the British bayonet? Where are your thousand warriors?
are they women? Have they no arms? are they sick? Does it become a
warrior chief of the Tarratine nation to descend thus from his dignity and
native independence? Have I lived to hear Sabatis confess that he is ready
at any moment to place himself and his braves under the command of an
inferior chief of the great British Sagamore? Shame, brother! where are
the shades of our fathers that they do not rise from their forest graves, and
reecho
shame
upon their degenerate son?'
Sabatis listened without moving a muscle. It was plain the Hunter
anticipated
that he would the next instant spring upon Natanis, for he rose
quickly and stepped between then. Sabatis, however, remained perfectly
unmoved. The young chief Scarlet Feather having thus spoken with such
eloquent indignation his feelings, sat silent, haughtily awaiting his brother's
reply. At length Sabatis opened his lips and spake. His voice was calm
and deep:
`Brother, you have spoken, and my cars have heard what was in your
heart. You are young, and I heed not your fiery speech. What I have
done, I have done! I have wisdom, and know what I do. I am chief of my
tribe, and I will lead them to what fighting ground I will. We are
brothers
;
let us be at peace. There is my hand.'
Natanis took his brothers' hand, and the two remained a few moments
seated in silence. The excitement gradually disappeared from the face of
Scarlet Feather, and lighting his calumet, Natanis smoked a few whiffs, and
then handed it to Sabatis.
`Brother, where are your warriors?' asked Natanis in a careless tone,
after
he had again received the pipe from the Sagamore, smoked and handed
it to the Hunter.
`They are on the Konoco Lake. They hunt and fish there! I left them
three days ago to come hither.' Sabatis cast his eye down as he a
and Scarlet Feather saw that his brother deceived him in his reply.
`Why are you here? If I am not mistaken this is not far from the
Nerijewees
,
the foes of your tribe, he remarked in a quiet way.
`Their lodges are in the valley beyond the ridge of hills to the East!'
answered
Sehatis looking in that direction.
`
You
are bold also, Scarlet Feather,' said the Hunter to lodge so nigh
them! We little thought to find you here!'
`Nor did I look for Sabates so far from his hunting grounds. Why does
his brother have the honor of his visit? did Sabatis come expressly to see
Natanis, or has be met the Scarlet Feather by accident?'
Sabatis made no reply. He was not inclined to tell the truth! The truth
was that the meeting was purely accidental. He had seen and recognized
Natanis the moment the latter had beheld the boat advancing, when finding
that he was discovered, he had landed and sent `Sharp Knife' forward, after
first holding a short discussion with him; for this unexpected recounter with
his brother was far from pleasing, either to him or Sharp Knife. He
remained
behind himself, to make up a parcel of pretended gifts, from trinkets he
had brought to reward such Indians as he might employ in his expedition
to assist in carrying his canoe from one river to another. From policy,
therefore
,
he had feigned great joy on beholding his brother, though he
apprehended
difficulty, in the further prosecution of his purposes in passing up the
river, from his opposition, should he diseover or suspect the object of this
secret expedition.
As Natanis regarded both his brother and the Hunter with a look of
suspicion
while he put his question to him, the Sagamore said evasively,
`It was accident meeting you
here
, brother! but our visit was to you;
though we expected to find you a day's journey to the north and east.'
`My tribe's lodges lie to the south and east! why then should my brother
seek for me in the direction he has named?' demanded Natanis with
increased
suspicion. `But I am found by you, brother. What would you
with Natanis? why have you come so far, and unattended to seek me.'
Before replying, Sebatis spoke a few moments earnestly aside with the
Hunter, and seemed to be influenced in his answer by Sharp Knife's
opinion
.
`To get your final decision, brother! will you take part with the British?
If you consent, I have a great advantage to offer you and an important
secret for your ear!'
Natanis was about to reply with a stern refusal, when the last words his
brother uttered, seemed to suggest to his mind a sudden thought. His
whole bearing was instantly changed to one of eager desire and intense
interest.
`Advantage said you, brother?' he asked with earnestness. `What
advantage
can I gain by joining in this quarrel between the pale-faces?'
Sabatis looked at Sharp Knife inquiringly as much as to say, `shall he be
trusted?' The Hunter shook his head doubtfully. This was not unnoticed
by Natanis, who was by this confirmed in his resolution to adopt the course
which had just before suggested itself to his mind.
`Brother, I
fear
to trust you, yet I would do so,' said the Sagamore.
`Did you not come to see me to trust me? Will my brother go again as
he came?' and the young warrior rose and walked haughtily away some
steps.
`I will
not
trust you, brother,' answered the Chief after a moment's
hesitation
,
rising also. `By the light of the Great Spirit I will not trust you!'
`We must do it, Sagamore, and confide in Scarlet Feather's honor;' said
Sharp Knife very firmly, but in a tone that Scarlet Feather could not hear.
`If we do not, he will, at any rate, suspect us; and as we can't return now
but
must
go on with our message, he will of course suspect mischief,
seeing
us continue our way north, after having visited him. We can give him
no excuse for keeping up the river. Besides, if we turn back, and then
double on our trail again, you may be sure, with his suspicions awakened
as they are, he will be a spy upon our heels. It was the fiend's luck falling
in with him here; and I wonder what he is doing, pitching his hunting lodge
so far from his own ground, and so near those of the Nerijewecs! It would
seem as if he was waiting for us; yet he could not know of our coming;
and besides, he does'nt seem to suspect the news we bear! we had best
trust him, as I think, from what he just said, he might be brought over to
our views; the idea of advantage to himself seems to have taken hold of
him.'
The Tarratine chief deliberated a moment, and then, as if deciding to
make a confidant of his brother, advanced towards him as he stood gazing
silently into the shadowy waters as they flowed by at his feet.
At the moment Sabatis came near, the quick eye of the young chief had
detected a stag coming down to the water on the opposite shore to quench
his thirst. The shades of evening placed the spot where the lodge stood in
dark shadows, it being on the west bank, while the shore on which the stag
stood, was still reflecting the light of the western sky. Quicker than
lightning
,
the bow of Scarlet Feather was raised, and his arrow levelled from
his ear. Sabatis, who was at the instant, almost within its range, fancying
himself the object, sprang back with a cry of surprise, drew his tomahawk
from his helt, and brandished it before him! The Hunter sprung forward
to arrest the arrow which from the position in which he stood, seemed to
his view aimed at the Sagamore's heart. But the arrow flew singing from
its string, which rung with a loud twang as if a chord of a base-viol had
been strongly struck, and the dashing, headlong plunge of the stag into the
flood showed them the true object of the young chiefs hostile
demonstration
.
Natanis smiled proudly and said with a tone of mingled grief
and contempt,
Brother! did you think that Natanis would lift his hand against the child
of his own mother! we are
brothers
.'
The Sagamore gloomily, and with a mortified look, replaced his
tomahawk
in his girdle, while the hunter, springing into the canoe, darted swiftly
across the rapidly flowing river to secure the noble animal which had
mingled
its life with the dark tide.
CHAPTER II.
Natanis and Sabatis.
The
two brother-chiefs stood a few moments in silence, watching the
receding canoe as it went on its swift course leaving behind it a silvery wake
of dancing waters; and when they saw the white Hunter disappear in the
shadowy curve of the river, beneath overhanging trees, in pursuit of the
stag which the current was bearing away upon its bosom, they turned and
gazed upon each other. The forests of the new world have never given
birth to two nobler sons than these two warrior brothers. Noble in their
persons, commanding in their carriage and height, native majesty seemed
enthroned upon their kingly brows. Erect, bold and fearless, with an eye
like the eagle's, and his head set upon his arched neck like a stag's, his
dignified port tempered by youthful grace, Natanis stood before his brother
a model for an Indian Hercules, or, better, the model for a statue which
should combine the strength of the Nemean hero with the elegance of
Apollo
.
His high forehead surmounted by his coronet of Eagle's feathers and
his towering scarlet plume; his arched brows spanning an eye clear as light
and full of courage; his Roman nose, chiselled without a fault, even to the
thin, delicate nostril; his expressive, well-shaped mouth which ever
betrayed
most eloquently by the slightest workings of the bright vermillion lips
the least emotion of his soul, with the spirit of intelligence and feeling that
shone through all, presented a countenance such as seldom meets the eye,
save among the proud, independant, chieftains of the Indian races. His
panther's skin, depending from his shoulders, leaving the right arm and breast
exposed and hanging like a mantle down to the knee, with the firm manner
in which he stood, like a pillar that may not be moved his arm extended
and grasping his bow, were in perfect harmony with the whole man, and
completed a striking picture of that native independence, and physical
dignity
characteristic of the Indian warrior.
The Sagamore was of a more powerful make, without the grace which
relieved the muscular strength of his brother. He had none of the
Apollo
in the the strong outlines of his massive frame. He was a savage
Hercules
,
gigantic, yet symmetrical; and looked as if he could slay lions by
pressing his knee upon their chests, and rending their jaws apart with his
hands. His countenance expressed none of that quiet dignity and
nobleness
of nature which characterized the loftier features of Scar et Feather.
His brow was heavy and very massive, with large, quick, fiery, gleaming
black eyes, ever restlessly moving beneath their deep coverts. His
complexion
was darker and coarser than that of Natanis, and his features
stronger
and more heavily moulded. His nose indicated great strength of
passions
and his mouth, full and large, betrayed the existence of a character
daring and ferocious. In a word, there was in the face of this chief, with
all its dignity of outline, an expression which repelled confidence at first
sight, and inspired the opposite sentiments of mistrust and dislike. His
cheeks were striped with blue and red paint, drawn in such lines as would
increase the natural ferociousness of his aspect. His height, bearing and
person were, nevertheless commanding; exhibiting the native majesty of
form and stature peculiar to the family of the Abanaquis, from which he,
as well as Natanis, had sprung.
`Brother,' said the Sagamore in a deep, guttural tone, `you are a great
brave, and your warriors are as the trees of the forest. Yet you hold
dominion
over but a third of the hunting-grounds our father swayed.'
`
Egos-mah!
Natanis hears his brother's words. They are true. What
does the Sagamore mean to say more?'
`That Natanis is not a warrior unconcerned to let the pale-face dwell
where his fathers' lodges stood! he is not the chief to let the pale-faces'
white-winged ships sail upon the rivers that once flowed through his fathers'
hunting-grounds, when he can regain them! does Natanis behold the silvery
peak of yonder mountain piercing the skies? the boy of fifteen years can
remember when, within the eye's wide range from its summit, not the
smoke of a white man's cabin curled upward to the clouds; now the huts
of the white woodman are fast approaching its base; and ere the boy be
gray, from yonder peak the eye of the solitary and homeless Indian shall
behold, from horizon to horizon no where ascending the smoke of a lodge
belonging to his tribe. The axe of the pale-face will have levelled his
forests
,
and the cities of the pale-face will stand in the vallies and by the
rivers
!
Does my brother hear?' asked Sabatis with a dark frown.
`I hear,' answered Natanis; `I know that the white man covets our lands,
and that he has many leagues of our hunting-grounds! these were not sold
him by Natanis, but by our father. Of Natanis, no pale-face shall ever have
a bow's span of land, save for his grave. What he received from his father,
he will keep.'
`A
io!
well spoken, Natanis. Now, we are one. I find in your breast an
echo to my own thoughts. But let Natanis open his ears, while his brother
speaks. The power of the white warriors increases. The winged ships at
every wind bring pale-faces from the rising sun. They must have more
lands! Their Sagamore at Boston came to me two moons ago, and asked to
buy lands for gold? I refused him!'
`You did well, brother,' said Natanis with pride. `So came to me a
messenger from the same white Chief. I filled a horn with earth, from the
grave of our father beneath my lodge, and bade him say to his chief that
Natanis never sold the ashes of his ancestors!'
A slight emotion of noble feeling, such as a sentiment like this should
awaken, seemed to elevate the expression of the Sagamore's countenance,
as he gazed approvingly upon his brother.
`Then, brother, we are one,' he said with emphasis. `We are not friends
to the Pale-faces?' This was spoken with a searching look of inquiry.
`I am neither their friend nor their foe, brother. Our father smoked the
calumet of peace with their great Sagmore at Boston, and they are not our
enemies.'
`They are
mine
,' answered the Sagamore sternly and vindictively. `Our
father buried the hatchet, but I will unearth it and sharpen it! Sabatis can
never sleep while the axe of the white woodman rings from afar in his ears,
and he knows the forests which sheltered his fore-fathers are falling to the
earth, emblems of our our own fall and ruin! No, Natanis, I am the foe of
the white-man, the haughty invader of our hunting-grounds! the desecrator
of our forest homes!'
`Yet you say, you are the friend of the English?'
`
Dubel dock!
The English are beyond the St. Lawrence, brother. Their
lodges, and their Sagamore are upon the rock of Quebec! The English
have not taken our lands from us. On the contrary, they are at war with
the Pale-facesthe Bostonees,
*
*
The Indians of Maine invariably applied the term `Bostonee' to the Massachusetts colonists
from the name of their principal town.
who have robbed us of our inheritance and
are daily making invasions upon what remains. I am not hostile to the
English! They are a great and powerful nation whose lodges are far off.
We have nothing to fear from them. The Bostonees are our foes, and the
English are their foes, therefore should we be the friends of the English.'
`You speak of war between them, brother! with this we have nothing to
do. Whichever conquers, will be equally our foe, and equally strive to
possess
our lands. If the English are conquerors, and take the lands of the
Bostonees, they will next want ours, like these. Let us not mingle in the
quarrel, brother.'
`
Saw-got!
' I have already done it. I have pledged myself to be the friend
of the English Sagamore. He has sent me great presents, and has
promised
to give me back all my hunting grounds if he conquers the Pale-faces
who hold them. Now, brother, the same offers he will make you! Behold
here are some of the presents I have received!' and the chief unfolded the
otter-skin to display his gifts. `These I bring to thee as a pledge of what
thou shalt hereafter receive. Behold! here are sharp spear heads of
shining
steel, barbed arrow-heads, glittering medals, a coronet of silver, medals
of gold, and bracelets of precious stone.'
`For such trinkets as these is Sabatis bought?' cried Scarlet Feather
contemptuously
,
glancing at them, and then turning his eyes scornfully
away.
`
Ou-wa!
These are but trifles to what I have, brother,' answered Sabatis
frowning darkly, and looking disappointed at the indifference of his brother
to what had dazzled his more savage eye; though, as we have before said,
these trinkets were not brought as a present for Scarlet Feather, but only
offered to him as an after-thought to help conceal the true nature of his
mission.
`You spoke to me of advantage, brother,' said Natanis. `These gew-gaws
tempt me not!' They will please a woman!'
`
See!
These are spear-heads and arrow-head of steel!'
`They tempt me not. What advantage didst thou speak of, a while
ago?'
`Have I not told thee?the restoration of thy hunting-grounds.'
When I want them, I and my warriors shall recover them. I would not
follow the noblest deer that ever roamed in the forest, one bound upon lands
made mine by the British bayonet!'
`
Saw-got!
If thou wert not my mother's son, I would quarrel with thee! but,
peace be between us! know then, Natanis, I am to take sides with the
British. Swear to me that you will not take part, thou and thy warriors
with the Bostonees!'
`That I will swear most cheerfully, brother. I am not in want of gold
that I should sell my warlike independence even to these, though I have
towards them more friendly feelings than I have towards the English. Dost
thou not remember that our father in one of his hunting expeditions beyond
the mountains of the north encountered a white Hunter, an Englishman
from the Canadas. He found him torn by a bear and dying for want of
succor
.
Our father took him to his lodge, bound up his wounds, and
hospitably
entertained him until he recovered; and when he was once more strong
he sent two of his people with him, to guide him to the white-man's lodges
on the Chaudiere. When the white man came among his own people, he
invited his guides into the lodge of the Sagamore, on the pretence of
refreshing
and rewarding them; and taking advantage of their confidence
they took them captive and sent them to Quebec bound as prisoners,
whence one escaped, (theother having died) to tell the shameful tale of
English treachery.'
I heard the tale. But 'tis nothing. So would the Bostonee have done.
They speak one tongue, and their fathers dwelt in the same lodge under the
same great Sagamore.'
`Haar what the Bostonee did do. Three winter's ago, I was hunting on
the lower Kennebis. The doe I was in pursuit of, leaped from a precipice,
and before I could check my speed, I followed and fell many feet, and lay
there insensible and bruised from the fall, I know not how long. When I
came to myself, I was lying upon a bear-skin in the lodge of a
white-hunter
of
a Bostonee. He was watching over me with the gentleness of a
maiden who watches the couch of her sleeping lover. Ten days I was his
guest, and when I left to seek the lodges of my people he accompanied me,
taking me in his own canoe till the smoke of my lodge was in sight. He then
said to me,
`Chief, when next you meet a white man in your hunting-grounds in
distress
,
remember me and succor him, even though he hath slain they
brother
!
In me, you behold Kresley the Fish-Spearer!'
`And who was he?' demanded Sabatis impatiently.
`I had the year before, with an arrow in shooting at a deer, by accident
slain
his
brother!' answered Natanis impressively. `Now judge you, broth
er,' he added after a few moments silence, `between the English of Canada,
and the generous Bostonee Hunter.'
`And for this only, you are hostile to one people, and a friend to the
other?'
`I am willing my tribe should be judged by any one of my people in it,'
answered the young chief proudly.
`At this moment Sharp Knife landed a few yards below them, with the
dead stag in the boat. The Sagamore approached him, and briefly
informed
him of the issue of his conversation with his brother.
`Well, Chief,' said the Hunter, `if he can't be prevailed on, and is so
prejudiced, why, the only way we can do, is to let him alone and keep on
our way. The moon will be up soon. He had better suspect, than know
the truth, as he might possibly put some obstacle in our way; and we have
not an hour to lose. I had rather have lost my rifle than fallen in with
him!'
`I am resolved, when the moon rises, to take leave of him and proceed
down
the river. After a mile or two, we can take to the forests and double
so as to gain a point above him, and then take to the river again! we shall
have to pass full near the lodges of Neridgewecs to do this!'
`This will be our only course. It is quite likely he is by this time
satisfied
that your only object in coming here, was to get him to take part in the
quarrel. I don't think he will suspect us; for it is impossible he can yet
know the truth; not the fastest runner could have got up the river in
advance
of us. So let us deceive him by putting back awhile, and then keep
on our course again as fast as we can move forward by water and trail.'
The course here suggested, was decided on. The Sagamore approached
his brother, and soon afterwards took leave of him, the parting being cold
and distrustful on both sides. They then reentered their boat, Scarlet
Feather accompanying them to the bank; and just as the moon appeared
above the forest-llne in the eastern horizon, the canoe floated into the stream,
and, propelled by the strong arm of the tall Hunter, shot rapidly down the
tide, and was soon lost to the gaze of the young Chieftain in the gloomy
shadows of the overhanging shores.
Natanis remained standing for some moments where his brother had last
parted from him, his arms folded across his breast, his face thoughtful, and
his manner grave.
`This is a strange visit of Sabatis to me!' he said, in a slow reflecting
tone. `There is something lies deeper than the surface I have had shown
me! my brother came not thus far from his own hunting grounds to ask
me what he knew before, and then to go back again as he came. Their
canoe was standing up the river, and but for seeing me here, I am sure it
would have kept on its upward course. There is, perhaps, treachery meant
towards me. Sabatis loves me not; and would readily sacrifice me to his
own ambition. His visit in this quarter is not to see me, alone, else why
did he make me no definite proposition? It is clear my presence here was
unlooked for by both him and Sharp Knite, and their embarrassment I could
read in their looks and efforts to ingratiate me. Nor could they have known
my hunting lodge was here. Not one of my own warriors knows it, nor
hath any one crossed my trail the three days I have been here. My
presence
here is known only to
one!
'
And he pronounced the last word his face assumed an expression of
tenderness
and gentle pride, and looking towards the moon he said, with lively
emotion,
`It is time I sought again the lodge of Willewa. For
love's sake
, might I
have answered the white Hunter, am I here in the huntinfi-grounds of the
Nerigewees! for the sake of the beautiful Pearl of the Eye, is the
hunting-lodge
of Natanis pitched in the sight of the smokes of a tribe hostile to his
fathers!'
As he spoke he turned from the spot and advanced towards his lodge.
As he came near it, he saw standing before it a young female who, while
he was gazing down the river after the departing Sagamore, had crossed
the stream above, in a light bark propelled by her own hand, and landed
near his cabin, which she approached with shrinking, yet anxiously hurried
steps.
`Willewa!' he exclaimed, recognizing her, for the moon shed her
radiance
full upon the spot where she stood.
`Natanis! Pardon me! I came hither to'
He interrupted the tremulous, musical tones with which she would have
hurredly explained her errand, by pressing her to his manly breast, and
saying, smilingly,
`What need I care, fair Peal of my Eyes, what brought thee hither, so I
behold thee, and know thou art present with me? Comest thou, doubtless,
to chide Natanis for loitering when he should have been on his way to meet
thee at the Doe's fountain beyond the river, as he promised last night when
he parted from thee there!' and again he pressed the graceful Indian girl to
his heart; and then holding her back, gazed by the moonlight upon her
lovely olive brow, and ingenious countenance, over which grateful love, and
maidenly modesty, played charmingly.
`Natanis, I bring thee strange, and weighty news!' she said withdrawing
herself with sweet, native dignity from his ardent gaze.
`What, dear Willewa? Has thy pet doe escaped? or the singing bird I
gave thee flown away to its fellows in the wood? or'
`Nay, Natanis, I have more serious news than this,' answered the indian
maiden impressively.
`Then I will hear thee tell what makes thy warbling tones so sad to-night.
Sit down in my lodge, for thy heart throbs like a fawn's that has been
pursued
!
There is my mantle,' he said taking the panther's skin from his
shoulders
,
and throwing it down upon the floor of his lodge.
No, not in thy lodge, Natanis,' she said with blushing embarrassment.
`Here, without by the door in the fair moonlight!'
`Then here in the fair moonlight, sweet Pearl of my Eyes!' said the
lover
playfully; and taking the skin from the lodge, he placed it for her upon
the ground outside. `Now what have those little talking cherries to say?'
he said touching her lips lightly with his forefinger.
But ere we listen to what the beautiful Willewa has to reveal to her
noble
lover, which brought her at that hour alone, to seek him at his lodge,
we will tell who this maiden was. Allusion has already been made to the
tribe of Norigewees as having their national lodges not far from where
Natanis had planted his own hunting cabin, and as being hostile to him and
his tribe. This people were once the most warlike and imperious in all the
East. Their tribe had originally, in centuries past, belonged to the
Tarratine
and Abanaquis races, from which all the inferior tribes in Maine had
also sprung. The Norigewees were a powerful Tarratine family which had
rebelled under a younger brother of the Tarratine King, and never being
subdued, had increased to become a distinct and powerful tribe. Its sway
extended over the vast region between the falls of the Kennebbis, and the
mountains of the northern wilderness; and its chiefs were all distinguished
for their warlike courage. The feud which existed from its very origin
between
this tribe and the equally powerful families of the Tarratine's and
Abanaquis, kept alive in all three nations a spirit of war, and an hereditary
quarrel. The Tarratine and Abanaquir chiefs were by no means disposed
to acknowledge the independance of a revolted tribe, though three
hundred
years had elapsed since the original ogence; nor was the haughty rebel
ceieftain disposed to yield submission to a power that was no stronger than
himself.
This state of hostile feeling prevented all intercourse between the
parties
,
and the warriors of both families only met in the hunt, to convert the
hunting-field into a battle plain.
It was on such an occasion as this not long before the opening of our
story, thht Natanis chanced to see Willewa the beauteous daughter of the
proud Nerijewca chieftain
Canassa
! But we have the further development
of this love-passage to the next chaptor.
CHAPTER III.
The Chase.
It
was about two months previous to the time we have chosen for the
opening of our story, that Scarlet Feather, at the head of thirty young
warriors
of his tribe, left his national lodges, on the beautiful lake Tuteloe,
*
*
Now `Allston Lake,' in Kennebee County.
for
a grand hunting expedition. As the past season the Nerigewecs had
penetrated
his hunting-grounds, and driven the deer from the rivers to the
wilderness
,
Natanis resolved not only to pursue the chase towards the
mountains
,
but also invade the territories of the Nerigewecs, by crossing their
hunting grounds to the upper forest, instead of following the course of the
river, which, among all the tribes, was held sacred as a common
thorough-fare
.
The afternoon after leaving his own people, he crossed the Kennebis
above the falls of the Nerigewecs, and entered upon their hunting grounds.
The young men whom Scarlet Feather had selected from his warriors
for this expedition were about his own age, and among the very bravest of
his followers; and in nobleness of spirit, and pride of character they were
not unlike himself. After they had crossed the river and stood together
upon a rock upon which they had landed, with the towering forests of their
foes rising majestically around them, Natanis with a wave of his hand
gathered his braves around him, and thus addressed them:
`Warriors and brothers! we are now pressing with our feet the soil of
the haughty Nerijewee! In these forests they hunt their game, and from
the bosom of yonder hills ascend the smokes of their lodges. We are
Abenaquies
,
and do not fear to stand in the sight of the lodges of our foes. We
have entered their hunting grounds to pursue in them the deer and the bear
and the moose, as we do in our own. Natanis would not have been the first
aggressor upon their territories, for he is content with his own, and the deer
loves the shade of our forests as well as that of our foes! But the proud
Chief Canassa has invaded our lands, and hunted the doe before the very
doors of our lodges. His warriors have driven the game from our rivers
and lakes when we were hunting on the hills, and we must pursue the chase
even to the mountains that we may have food and raiment for ourselves and
our little ones. It is true, we can follow the river's course to where deer
are plenty, but 'tis a day's journey farther, than crossing the hunting grounds
of our foes. Let us enter them and pursue the chase, and at our leisure go
northward to the hills; it may be the forests of our enemies will furnish
game an abundance without seeking it in the wilderness of the north.
Now, my braves, you know what is the mind of Natanis. Let us go onward
to the hunt, and while we pursue the game that offers, let us not forget that
we are surrounded with foes, and act with wisdom and prudence. Let no
warrior go alone, but keep together in parties of ten; and when danger
menaces, let us give the hunting war cry of the Abenaquies, and reunite for
defence! Attack none of the braves of the Nerigewecs if you cross them in
your path; for we are hunters and our arrows are sharpened only for the
deer and the wild beast. But if we are attacked we will let the
Nerigewecs
know that we are the sons of Abanaquis!'
This address of the young chief wa received with a shout of warlike
enthusiasm
,
by the young braves around him, and the clashing of their bows
and spears together manifested a disposition more for the battle than the
chase. The scene presented at this moment was singularly brilliant, yet
wildly savage. Natanis stood alone upon a slight elevation of the rock
which overhung the dark water as it went wheeling and rushing past at its
base in a hundred involving circles. Above his head towered a majestic
oak, which overshadowed him and his braves. The opposite banks were
high and precipitous, clothed with wood to their summits, save where here
and there a bold boary rock forced its rugged brow, or shoulder through
the foliage that enveloped it like a mantle. Upon the lofty spine of a
lightning-blasted
pine sat an eagle, who at intervals shook his immense pinions,
and uttered the fierce, shrill shriek, which the Indian Warrior imitates
and makes his war-cry. Around the young Chief stood his braves, a
picturesque
and formidable band, dressed in skins or gay mantles, with plumes
nodding above their brows, spears or bows in their hands, painted quivers
at their backs, and with their bronzed breasts and right arm naked. They
stood around him with dark, earnest, brave countenances, and flashing eyes,
their nostrils working like those of the impatient charger, and their attitudes
spirited and daring.
`Yonder eagle gazes down upon us, and his shriek is warlike; but let us
not catch his spirit to-day, my braves!' said Natanis, as he looked from the
noble bird upon his followers with an air of pride. `We are hunters and
not warriors, until the war-cry of the Nerijewecs is heard in our ears.
Then
, let us sheath the hunting-knife, and grasp the war-hatchet as
become
Abanaquies. Now to thee hase, brothers. He who strikes down the
first stag shall have a feather from the crest of yonder eagle.'
As he spoke, he fitted an arrow to his yew-bow and sent the fatal missile
flying upward and onward over the river with unerring velocity. The
Eagle
uttered a fierce cry as he saw the whizzing messenger of death
approaching
,
and spread his heavy wings to soar. But the light dart pierced his
majestic breast and fastened its barbs deep in his body. He nevertheless
rose, and darted wildly through the air in irregular flight, now essaying to
ascend, and then plunging impotent perpendicularly far downward; but
recovering himself ere he struck the water soared again, madly, the while,
plucking at the arrow with his strong beak, and vainly endeavoring to tear
it from his body.
`Nay! Let him soar, Ayane', cried Natanis to a youthful Indian by his
side who suddenly drew an arrow to the bead, and was about to launch it
from the string, as he saw the Eagle, after nearly striking the water, rise
perpendicularly upward again; `Let him battle with his fate, Ayane. He
struggles bravely, and has a noble spirit! I would my arrow had not flown
so truly, for I am sorry that I sent him his death. It is like seeing a brave
warrior-chief die. Look! Behold! he has torn the dart from his bosom
with his ferocious beak, and holding it in his talon rises proudly and
triumphantly
into the air!'
All eyes watched the Eagle as he went soaring into the skies, higher and
higher, till he appeared to the eye no bigger than a sparrow. He then
seemed to become stationery, when Natanis exclaimed,
`The noble bird will live; he deverves his life. My shaft pierced not to
his proud heart. No! See, my braves! he descends like the lightning from
a cloud!'
There was a general murmur of surprise and savage admiration, as they
saw the bird falling from the skies with the velocity of an arrow. The
descent
,
though as rapid as the eye could follow its course, was erratic and
irregular, the wings now wildly flapping, and now pressed closely to the
body, and then again flaring wide. It was therefore evident that the bird
was either dead, or had no control over himself. Nearer and nearer the
earth came the huge body, making the air roar as it passed through it, in its
swift descent, when suddenly it plunged into the current close at the feet of
the hunting party, dashing over them, in its heavy plunge, a shower of
spray.
Ayane, the young Indian, leaped into the flood, and bearing it to the shore,
laid at the feet of Natanis the dead monarch of the mountain peaks, the
arrow which the young Chief had launched at his breast, still clenched in
the iron-grasp of his talon.
Natanis plucked from the crest of the war-eagle a tuft of feathers, and
placing them among those of his own coronet, said,
`Now, my braves, to the chase. He who strikes down the first stag in
the hunting-grounds of the Nerijewec shall wear this Eagle's crest in token
of his rank as a hunting-chief.'
Tne party of hunters now formed in three divisions, and in a few
moments
were moving in as many lines, nearly parrallel with each other,
through the forest, in the direction of the river uplands, where they knew
the dear would be, at that hour feeding. For the night, Natanis had
appointed
a rendezvous at a fountain about two leagues north ward, near the
river's bank. Leaving the two hunting parties to which Natanis was not
attached, to pursue the chase in their own way, we shall follow our young
Chief and his hunters. Natanis kept on for about a mile without seeing
any game, but crossing three trails which he knew to belong to some
hunting-party
of the hostile tribe, whose territories he was so boldly invading.
He at length came to a small, but beautiful lake placed in the midst of the
forest, like a crystal vase set in a bed of flowers. Gentle hillsides, clothed
with fragrantly blooming trees, ascended from its circular brim, birds were
singing in the over-hanging branches, fishes were glaucing in the sun-light
beneath its surface, and the deep blue sky without a cloud, was reflected in
its bosom. To add to the rare beauty of this gem in the wilderness, a
small island, green as emerald, with a few old oaks growing upon it, and
casting beneath an inviting shade, was anchored in the midst. On this
island
,
the shores of which, on all sides of it, were about a quarter of a mile
or a long bow's shot from the shores of the lake, the birds were more
numerous
than on the main, filling the old oak grove with melody, while deer
and does were grazing or reclining in the peaceful glades. The island was
not large, being not two arrow-flights across, either in length or breadth.
When Natanis came suddenly upon this beautiful lake of the forests, he
paused upon its shores a few moments to contemplate its quiet; for the
child of nature loves to gaze on the features of the Great Parent, on whose
bosom he has been nourished, and has a heart to feel and a mind to
appreciate
the fairer lines of her beauty.
While he stood there, wrapped in pleased surprise, a herd of deer was
discovered by his warriors, cooling their limbs in the water, about half way
round the circle of the lake. There were visible, full a score of
these animals, among them three stately stags. Desirous of striking the
first stag, the whole party started in excited pursuit, not even looking round
to see if they were followed by their Chief, but rather emulous to outstrip
him in the chase. Ayane, however, after running along the sparkling sands
of the beach a few hundred yards and seeing that Natauis did not follow,
turned back and rejoined him.
`Go with the hunters, Ayane;' said the Chief to him in the kind tone in
which he always spoke to the youth whose eyes, looks and manner evinced
the closest devotion and love for his Chieftain.
`Ayane would not leave Natanis alone, with foes around,' answered the
young Abanaquis.
`Then come with me! I see on the island the antlers of a nobler stag
than stands in the water among yonder herd they have gone in pursuit of.
He must be the King of his species, and as such worthy to receive his death
wound at the hand of Natanis!' The young chief spoke with that simple
and ingenuous pride, that native dignity of character peculiar to the Indian,
as if properly conscious of his power and independence as the Princely
head of a warlike tribe.
`How can we react the island, my chief?' asked Ayane, his dark eyes
brightening as he beheld the majestic autlers which Natanis had pointed
out, peering above a group of shrubbery near the shore of the island.
`There lies a canoe of the Nerijewecs' answered Natains, pointing to a
birchen
conoi
half-concealed under the drooping foliage of a willow that
hung like like a vast green umbrella over the bank, leaving beneath a sort of
arching shelter, within which the little bark was moored.
Ayane sprang into the canoe, and emerged in it from its covert, and the
chief standing upright in its centre, the young Indian propelled it swiftly
towards the island. Natanis stood up with his bow strung, and the feather
of his arrow betwen his fore-finger and thumb, and with his eye keenly
watching the moving antlers over the top of the bushes. Suddenly a
dashing
of water came from the lake shore and Natanis saw the whole herd of
deer in motion, having discovered the approaching party of hunters, who,
as they came near them, had separated so as to encircle them and enclose
them with the lake in their rear. But the stags first took the alarm and
tossing their branching heads high into the air, shook them, snuffed up the
wind, snorted like horses when alarmed, and then dashed towards the
forest
coverts. Then came the wild, answering cries of the hunters, and
arrows
winged with death flew among the terrified fugitives, and one here
and one there plunged headlong in full course and struggled in the
ensanguined
waters around them. The stag and a dozen of the does reached
the wood and went flying down its glades, the Indian hunters in fierce
pursuit
.
Natanis watched this spirited scene with an excited countenance, and
then turned his eyes upon the island which they were closely approaching.
The majestic stag, which had allured him from the main, had taken the
alarm, and unable to see, from his position, the hunters and the herd they
were pursuing, on account of the intervention of trees, he stood still upon a
green knoll, to which he had trotted, his antlers aloft, his head thrown back,
his eyes strained and starting, and his attitude was that of flight without
motion.
He was a noble animal, as large as a war-charger, with a skin the tawny
hue of the lion's, and a broad, massive chest, white as snow. Natanis drew
his arrow to his ear, when the stag discovered him, and tossing his head
up and down several times in defiance, the arrow of the young Chief was
caught upon his shield-like antlers, and shivered like glass. The next
moment
Natanis was upon the shore with his hunting lance in his band. He
launched it as he struck the beach, but the stag was already in full flight.
Natanis recovered his lauce, and his dog, which had
accompanied
him, swimming along with the boat from the main, bringing him to
bay, he a second time cast it, and wounded the noble animal in the
shoulder
.
The stag again fled, and was again brought to bay by the staunch
hound, and maddened by his wound, he rushed, forward and by a fierce
stroke of his antler embowelled the dog, and then trampled upon him with
his strong hoofs. An arrow from the bow of Natanis fastened itself in his
neck, and the outraged monarch of the forest, shaking it to the ground, and
made furious by the pain, dashed towards the young Chief, emitting a harsh
noise from his lungs, like the angry roaring of a bull. So sudden and
unexpected
was the change that Natanis, who, at that moment had his hand in
the quiver withdrawing a third arrow, would have been thrown down by
the infuriated animal, but for an arrow from the bow of Ayane who was
close behind him. The young Indian had aimed so truly that the point of
the dart penetrated deep into the breast of the stag, who reared high in the
air and gave utterance to a cry as shrill as the shriek of an Eagle. Ayane,
seeing him stagger and bleed copiously, sprang forward, elevating his knife
to strike him to the heart, when the stag, lowering his head caught him
upon
his broad antlers, and tossed him high into the air. With the effort, the
stag reeled and fell to the earth, while the sharp dagger of Scarlet Feather
entered his heart. The young chief then flew to the succor of his young
brave, who lay insensible upon the ground, where he had descended in his
heavy fall. Raising him up in his arms he tenderly bore him to the
water-side
,
where he bathed his temples and used other means to restore him to
consciousness, while he carefully bound up a wound that was freshly
bleeding
in his side. At length Ayane opened his eyes and gratefully
acknowledging
by a glance of affection the kindness of his chief, breathed a deep
sigh of pain, and again sunk into unconsciousness.
Natanis, distressed for the fate of the young warrior, to whom his soul
was bound with the bonds of more than brotherly love, looked round as if
seeking for assistance. None of his people were visible, and he hastened to
a slight eminence in the centre of the island, where he could obtain a view
of the main on the opposite side of it, where the hunters had surprised the
herd of deer. But he could see only two or three wounded does dragging
themselves to the water, to quench their feverish thirst but all else was
without
life.
`They have penetrated the forest and are now lost to sight. I will give
the hunting cry of recall, though it may bring upon me even a band of my
foes. Ayane must not perish, but be borne to our lodges by some of the
warriors. Poor Ayane! This thou hast suffered to save me. I had rather
it had been me than thee, for thou hast the love of a gentle maiden, whose
eyes will weep tears of grief for thee. But
I am alone
.'
As he spoke he raised his fingers to his lips, and the shores of the lake
and the deep forests beyond, rung and echoed with the shrill eagle-cry of
the young chief. Again the wild alarm of the hunter rose upon the air,
rising note after note, till the very eagles of the cliffs on the river, soared
from their eyries and answered it from the sky. But no human reply
reached
his ears.
With a look of disappointment he hastened back to his friend whom he
found in a deep, yet suffering sleep. He took him in his arms and bore him
far into the grove where the coolness and shelter invited to repose. Here
he laid him upon a bed of moss, softer than piled velvet; and seating
himself
by his side, he took his hand and gazed sadly upon him, forgetful of the
chase, and of all else save the sacred offices of friendship.
The day was drawing to a close, and the long lines of alternate sun-beams
and shadows that the setting sun leaves in his path, were stretching across
the green sward of the island, and Natanis still remained by the stumbering
youth, carefully watching each motion and anxiously regarding every sign
of returning sensibility. Before him was an opening in the trees which
gave him a glimpse from the island across the water into the wood on the
main, and up a narrow and secluded creek that lost itself in the forest-depths,
It was on the side of the island oposite to that on which the herd of deer
had been started, and the inlet had not before been noticed by him,
especially
as its mouth was closely shielded by overhanging trees. While his eyes
were absently regarding the spot, he fancied he detected a thin, blue
smoke winding its way over the distant tree tops and gently curling in the
sunny air. He watched the appearance more steadily and was satisfied that
he was not deceived.
`There is a lodge!' he exclaimed with animation; `whether of foe or
friend it matters not! Ayane must have shelter to-night! I will leave him to
seek the place whence the smoke issues. Even thy haughty chief Canassa
will not refuse hospitality to his enemy who craves it.
He gazed a few moments anxiously upon the wounded and insensible
young hunter, and seeing that there was no change manifest in his
condition
,
he was about to rise to depart on his errand, when he felt a tongue
licking
his hand. He turned and saw the large, noble stag-hound, whom he had
forgotten, and supposed dead, crouching by his side. Behind him he saw
a trail of blood with which he had died the grass as he slowly dragged
himself
over it to his master's side.
`Poor Keenuck!' said Natanis sadly, laying his hand kindly upon his
majestic
head; `sorrowing for Ayane I had not a thought for thee. The fierce
stag has torn thee terribly, poor dog!'
Keenuck looked gratefully and affectionately with his blood shot and
heavy
eyes up into the face of his friend, stretched forth his shaggy neck to
lick his hand once more, and then keeping his fading eyes upon his
countenance
,
till the slowly drooping lid shut in his sight forever, the faithful
creature, with just strength enough to lay his head upon his master's knee,
sighed heavily and died.
Natanis surveyed him a few moments with a look of melancholy regret,
and then, brushing a manly tear from his eyes, he hastened to the shore and
cast himself into the canoe.
CHAPTER IV.
The Indian Maid.
The
young Chief, after reaching the water-side, had returned for Ayane,
and placed him in the canoe, still sleeping. He then seized the slender
paddle
and propelled the light, birchen bark across the space between the
island
and the shore, with the speed of an arrow, the bright, orange-colored
sides of the graceful canoe shining like gold as they glanced in the level
beams of the sun. He soon reached the entrance of the inlet, and shot his
boat forward between its green banks, stooping low as he passed into it to
avoid the bending branches that arched over it, nearly meeting in the centre.
The inlet was winding and narrow, with so dense a covering of foliage
suspended from vines that swung from tree to tree, that the sun-light only
penetrated it here and there, through a larger opening in the verdant
canopy
.
It was like entering, and sailing far into a cavern of foliage.
Natanis did not regard the solitude or the singular beauty of the tortuous
canal up which he was moving; but with one object in view, the safety and
shelter of his young friend, he steadily ascended the stream, his passage
disturbing many a singing bird on its leafy branch, and startling many a
fawn from its covert. He had been advancing up the inlet for about ten
minutes in this way, when he saw appearing before him through the trees
a bright sunny knoll rising gently from the water; and he pushed forward
to reach the bright scene. In a few moments he emerged from the
umbrageous
inlet into the loveliest spot his eyes had ever beheld, or his fancy had
ever painted. He suspended his paddle in the act of cleaving the water to
gaze around him. There was, just before him a lovely basin scooped out
by nature from a table of the purest marble, and into it, from the top of a
dark green rock, leaped a glittering cascade. The sound of its ceaseless
fall filled the place with a soothing murmur, with which was mingled the
rippling of a score of mimic torrents, which, clambering over the brim of
the vast marble basin which was overrunning to its edge, leaped sparkling
and laughing down the rocky sides, or flowed smoothly and shining over
the green sward to mingle with a deep pool in which the inlet up which
he had come, lost itself. The verge of the pool was hung with the richest
mosses, and around the basin, on the terrace above it, clambered vines and
other creeping plants in full and brilliant flower, loading the air with clouds
of perfume. Upon the summit of the white marble precipice, the dazzling
surface of which was every where relieved by a net-work of foliage-laden
tendrils and gorgeous boquets of blooming shrubs planted by the tasteful
hand of nature in every crevice that would nourish a green plant; upon the
summit, over all, was a fringe of cedars and laurel-trees, forming against
the sky a rich and beautiful outline to the lovely scene below. The whole
place was sheltered by the encroaching forest, and seemed a fit abode for
that Indian Fairy, called the `Lady of the Waters and Woods.'
The scenery, however, did not alone command the surprised attention o
f
the young Chief. His eyes had discovered in a little valley not twenty
paces
wide lying between the bright sun-lit knoll and the basin and carpeted
with the softest green, a group of acacia-trees amid which he thought he
discovered a lodge. He gave a few strokes of his paddle lightly in the
water
as if fearing to disturb the calm repose of the beauteous place in which
he found himself, and entered the pool beneath the basin. He now saw
plainly that there was a lodge half hid in the group of acacias close by the
water-fall. With a sort of awe and curiosity, but with the situation of
Ayane and his need of succor uppermost in his thoughts, he touched the
moss-clad verge of the dark pool and landed.
He looked, and seeing that his friend continued to sleep with laboured
and heavy breathing, he hastened forward to the lodge which was
not twenty paces distant, up a gentle ascent of natural lawn. He went
forward with the spear grasped in his hand, for he expected to meet foes in
the hunting-grounds of his foes, yet was prepared to crave that hospitality
which no Indian warrior ever refused to his enemy in distress. He had
not gone five steps when a beautiful doe bounded from the other side of the
knoll where it was quietly browzing, and darted with fear towards the lodge.
He saw with surprise that its neck was encircled by a band or circlet of
wampum beautifully ornamented with shells, which jingled musically as it
bounded away. Softly he advanced with a watchful eye lest he should be
surprized, and with a noiseless step that he might not alarm the inmates of
the lodge ere he should reach its threshold. As he entered under the
acacias
he saw white shells sterwn upon the ground, and a sort of path-way
leading to the basin. Every thing had an air of singular neatness. The
lodge was tastefully constructed of interwoven garlands. A white deer
skin elaborately embroidered with dyed threads of bark and the glazed quills
of the porcupine, hung before the entrance for a door, but was now partly
drawn aside. Within, the ground was laid thick with bear-skins, and the
sides of the lodge were hung with dressed doe's-hides with ornaments
worked upon them. On every side, as well as that which formed the door,
Natanis saw conspicuous the representation of a bear's claw grasping a
hunting-spear, which he knew to be the device of the Nerijewic chief,
Canassa
.
He, therefore, knew that this was not only a lodge of this tribe, but
of some one of Canassa's family; and he was too familiar with the customs
of the Indian race to be told that the occupant of this lodge was a female,
and perhaps a maiden; for there was upon the floor of the lodge, a pair of
mocassins of delicate workmanship, and of a size, both together, not
longer
than the length and breadth of Scarlet Feather's hand. He saw, also,
a beautiful tiara of feathers hanging upon an antler above a fawn's skin,
that served as a couch for the occupant, and near it, upon another horn of
the antler, a mantle of golden, orange and green colored feathers curiously
woven together, and forming a magnificent mantle.
When Natanis saw the tiara and the mantle he stepped back with
respectful
awe; for he knew that none else than a princess of the tribe could be
the tenant of that fair home. He then remembered that he had heard that
Canassa had a daughter exceedingly beautiful. With an emotion of
diffidence
such as became a young Chief, he drew back from the door of the
lodge, refusing to enter it, and looked eagerly around for the mistress of
that charming habitation; for he felt not only a curiosity to behold the
daughter of his foe, but he felt that in her, his young friend would find a
protector and a careful nurse; for he knew the skill and gentleness of the
daughters of the forest and that their benevolence acknowledged no
distinction
between friend and foe.
Scarlet Feather was, also, by no means unimpressed with the startling
fact that the lodge of Canassa and those of his warriors could not be far
from the spot where that of the Prince's was found. But Natanis knew no
fear; and, so that he had his friend in safety he thought not of himself.
Nevertheless, he did not intermit that caution and circumspection which
was needful; for, if it were possible to find shelter for Ayane without
falling
in with Canassa or any of his people, Natanis would gladly have
avoided
meeting them; especially as he reflected that he had brought upon
himself
his present difficulties, by an act of hostility upon the very domains of
his hereditary foe. Being, therefore, uncertain how Canassa might
receive
him, he was desirous of finding the princess, and securing first her
favor and her protection for his young friend. He therefore turned aside
from the lodge, and followed the shell-path towards the basin, for he had
discovered light foot-prints leading in that direction from the door of the
lodge. He was also quite confident she must be near, as the doe, which he
supposed to be her pet, after skipping to the side of the marble terrace
stopped
and gazed wistfully behind a rocky wall by which a portion of the
basin
was hidden from him. He approached the doe, when the animal, with
a startled look, made a sudden leap behind the rock and disappered.
`Neta, what has alarmed you, my gentle doe?' said a soft, musical voice
which distinctly reached his ear from that side of the basin which was
hidden
from him by the rock behind which the doe had bounded.
He stood transfixed with delightful surprise. The sound of the sweet,
lute-like tones he had heard not only fell upon his ear, but thrilled across
the chords of his heart as if love's invisible finger had swept them. With
a richer color deepening the olive hne of his brow and cheek, he advanced
softly, and lightly ascending the rock which overhung the basin a few feet
above it, he looked down. Ae he gazed, he held his breath lest he should
scare the beautiful vision away which met his eye.
Just beneath him, upon a bank of moss softer in texture than the velvets
that cover the thrones of Empresses, and of a richer green thau the
emeralds
that sparkle upon their diadems was seated, half-reelining, a young
Indian
girl. She could not be eighteen summers old. She sat with one little
bewitching brown foot dropped to the depth of the exquisitely turned ancle,
into the pellucid water, her fringed leggings of the softest doe-skin being
rolled up to keep them dry. Upon her knee rested its fellow, upon which
she was fastening, with the loveliest fingers in the world, a mocassin no
bigger
than Cinderrella's slipper. Her hair was as black as the coat of a raven,
and hung around her in luxuriant, wavy masses, covering her like a veil; but
beneath it could be seen the folds of a robe of swan's skin, ermined with
the dark azure feathers of the blue-jay. This robe was, however, now
partly
thrown back, leaving exposed her perfectly rounded arm naked to the
shoulder. Upon the wrist were half a dozen massive silver bracelets, but
upon the shapely, taper fingers of her hand there was no ring. By her
side watching her, yet trembling from his recent alarm stood the doe which
she still addressed.
`You are easily terrified of late, Neta. Even a buck showing his
branching
head upon the top of the cliff, only to look down upon you, and envy
you your happy lot here with me, sets you scampering as if a hunter's cry
had fallen on your timid ears.'
Neta moved her head to this side and that as if listening and trying to
understand her young mistress' words, but still showing signs of fear and
snuffing the air.
`I will soon go and see what has alarmed you. It may be my father with
his warriors has returned from the lake of the Islands, and has sent for me.'
While she was speaking in those soft, melodious accents of her native
language
which had fallen so delightfully upon the ear of Natanis, she drew
the other foot from the water, dried it by folding it up as if it were a bird
in the nest of her long, dark hair, and then hid it in the other fairy-like
moccassin. She then rose from her seat and began to gather up the
magnificent
mantle of her inky locks, entwining her round, polished arm among
them, and evolving their bewildering mazes through her fiugers, or
sweeping
them over her shoulders; her figure displaying in every motion of the
act an elegance, grace, and physical beauty the most perfect. Her face was
now visible as she gracefully threw back her head, and turned half round
in the act of binding the abundant folds of her hair together upon the back
and neck.
The sight of her countenance caused Natanis to experience a sensation
of the most enthusiastic delight. Its faultless beauty filled him with
surprise
and admiration, and as he gazed upon it, his heart throbbed with
emotions
he had never known before.
Her olive and delicately-rounded forehead, half-hid by, and lying deep in
the shadow cast by her hair; her pencilled brows; her large, glorious eyes,
black as the starless night, yet flashing with fire like the dark cloud from
which the lightning darts forth: the long lashes, so long that they lay upon
the soft cheek, and curved laughingly back; the exquisite finish of her
narrow
,
strait nose; the short, upper lip carved so delicately, yet so beautifully
matching its mate, which was a thought riper and fuller; the small, round
chin, and exquisitely turned throat, the proud, deer-like carriage of the
superb
head, with the slender grace of her plant, ungirded figure presented a
model for the Grecian sculptor who would create a youthful Dian in her
native charms.
The expression of her face was gentle, kind and sweet-tempered, with a
certain spirited tone which increased its fascination. Having bound her
tresses low upon the back of her head, with a narrow band of scarlet
wampum
,
she said to Neta in a playful, reproachful tone,
`Now, my wild one, let us see who has frightened you. I could not go
with you bare-footed, and with my locks sweeping the ground, lest, instead
of my tather, I should meet some one of the young braves of my own
tribe.'
She then lightly bounded across a little chasm through which a stream of
water gushed, and swinging herself round the rock, followed by the doe,
proceded towards the cabin, her step light as a roe's, and full of
incomparable
grace. Natanis remained unseen upon the rock above her, and
suffered
her to pass him, admiring her as she moved. He then rose, and gently
followed her. The doe, with quicker instincts to detect a stranger's
presence
instantly saw the first movement made by the young chief, and
stopping
,
gazed full upon him with ears erect! The maiden turned round to see
what produced Neta's alarm, and her eyes fell upon the stately form of the
youthful chieftain. She saw at a glance that he was not a warrior of her
father's tribe; yet, instead of flying in alarm she stopped to gaze, struck
with admiration at his noble and manly beauty; and perhaps equally
arrested
by the tenderness and gentle interest with which he fixed his eyes
upon her.
Half-flying, yet fixed to the spot, Willewa stood for several seconds
regarding
him with curiosity and wonder. His respectful manner excluded
from the first all sense of fear. At length Natanis advanced, crossing his
hands upon his breast in token of amity. She moved not, but stood
trembling
even as her doe had done when receiving its chiding from her lips.
With her dark, Castillian eyes lowered timidly to the earth, the olive hue of
her cheek becoming each moment rosier and rosier, she awaited his
approach
.
`Daughter of Canassa,' he said with that native courtesy of manner which
in the Indian is so polished, `Stur of the forest, Natanis, Chief of the
Abanaquies
craves your hospitality.'
`Natanis, the Abanaquis!' she repeated, raising her eyes and fixing them
full upon him with surprise, while she drew back with a slight emotion of
fear.
`Such is your suppliant, fair maiden of the Fountains!' he said
involuntarily
dropping before her own; `a warrior and chief of a nation hostile to
thine, yet,' he added in a tone which love modulated most musically, `but
not to
thee!
'
`Why art thou here, Natanis!' she asked quickly and earnestly, her heart
evidently interested in the stranger, foe though he was to her race.
`Knowest thou not that these are the hunting-grounds of Canassa? Why
art thou here, except,' she added, resting her eyes steadily upon his face,
`except thou comest as an enemy at the head of thy braves?'
`No, fair Rose of the Woodland,' he said smiling. `I am not here to war
with Canassa! I came with the hunting-knife in my belt, not with the
war-hatchet
in my hand. I and a party of thirty hunters were on our way to
the mountains, and I passed through these forests, hunting as we went.'
`And yet thou sayest thou dost not come for war! Will Canassa let his
foe traverse his hunting-grounds and not offer him battle?'
`Nay, I sought not hostilities with thy father, fair Strawberry of the wil
derness! Last year Canassa and his braves pursued my deer through the
very smokes of lodges of my people when I and my warriors were absent
I have now entered his territories to show the haughty Nerijewec that
Natanis will not suffer an insult like this to pass without retaliation.'
`True, Natanis; I know my father was the aggressor. But why art thou
here alone? why crave the hospitality of the daughter of the foe?'
`Maiden! gentle Fawn of the forest, Natanis prays thee to hear his words
In our chase I came upon the beautiful lake not far distant in which is an
island. Seeing upon it a stately stag, I took a boat and accompanied by a
young warrior Ayane, landed upon the island. After a severe battle, the
stag was slain, first slaying my faithful dog, and then grievously wounding
my young brave, a youth dearer to me than a brother, nay! I love him as
would love a sister! he was gored by the antlers of the enraged stag, tossed
into the air and fell severely hurt. He has been, since then insensible, and
seeing on the main-land in this direction the smoke of a lodge, I placed him
in the canoe and found this place. I stood before your lodge, but finding
from its furniture that it was that of a daughter of the chief I did not enter
but sought you following your doe which I alarmed. I beheld you at the
fountain, and, unseen by you, gazed upon you; and as I gazed, my heart
was filled with love, and I no more remembered that thy father and I went
foes.'
The Indian maiden listened with blushes and a look of sweet delight
playing about her lovely mouth, and sparkling within the depth of her
heavily-fringed, down-cast eyelids.
`If Natanis seeks the hospitality of Willewa for his friend, her lodged
open to him!' she answered with animation, yet with a modesty which
beautifully became her at such a time. `Where is the youth?'
Natanis led the way to the canoe, and pointed in silent grief to the young
brave who still lay as he had left him. The pity and compassion of her
sex was at once awakened, and forgetful of all else but her hospitality, she
made Natanis bear the wounded Abanaquis to her lodge, and heaping up the
skins for his couch had him laid carefully upon them. She then placed her
fingers upon his pulse, and as she held them them there, Natanis thought
he would gladly take Ayane's place to have her gentle touch thus laid upon
him. Willewa, like all Indian maidens was a skilful leech, and knew not
only how to dress wounds, but what was good for healing them, and also
she knew how to prepare and apply the medicaments her skill extracted
from the numerous plants which grew in the forests.
She saw at once that bleeding must first be resorted to, and, assisted by
Natanis, who, by her direction bound up his arm with his wampum girdle,
she performed the operation with a very sharp flint. The result bore
honorable
testimony to her skill. for in a few minutes the heavy breathing of
the sleeper subsided, his pulse became calm, and the fever diminished. He
soon opened his eyes, smiled on seeing Natanis, and gazed with admiring
surprise upon the beauteous Indian girl. Willewa then gave him a small
piece of fragrant gum to dissolve in his mouth. It was a narcotic, and
under its influence Ayane again slept, but this time in a natural manner.
`He will wake with strength,' said the maiden.
`I cannot thank you, fairest Willewa,' said Natanis with grateful emotion.
`You have saved the life of my friend, and filled my bosom with joy. But
lovely Willewa, Pearl of my eyes,' he said with deep passion, `you have
inflicted
in the heart of Natanis a deeper wound than even Ayane has
received
,
and you only can heal it.'
`Natanis is not hated by Willewa,' softly answered the maiden with
touching
naturalness of word and air.
`Can Wilewa love Natanis?'
`Scarlet Feather is the foe of our race!'
`Willewa shall be as the incense of the Calumet of Peace to both
nations
.
In the loves of Willewa and Natanis, the hatred of the Abanaquies
and Nerijewecs shall be forgotten; the tribes of our people shall be one, and
the Kennebis shall no longer divide our hunting-grounds; for the smokes
of the council fires of Canassa and Natanis shall mingle together, and the
young Ahanaquis hunter shall pursue the stag side by side with the young
men of thy tribe.'
`Willewa's heart speaks with Natanis; but with her lips she says that the
daughter of Canassa can never be the wife of Abanaquis.'
`Canassa shall hear Natanis speak,' answered the young chief with
energy
,
while his eye sparkled with hope and joy. `If Willewa loves Natanis
with her heart, Canassa shall yet take the hand of Natanis and clasp it in
peace,'
An hour passed, an hour of exquisite happiness to the young lover, when
they were startled by a shrill cry which rung through the forest, and
reechoed
from the marble cliff above their heads.
`It is my father: he has returned from the lake!' cried Willewa in alarm.
`He may visit me here; fly!'
`And leave Ayane?'
`I will protect him, noble Natanis. Let not Canassa behold you now. I
must first talk with my father. Come with me.'
Prevailed upon by her, Natanis suffered her to guide him by a steep path
up the precipice, passing, as they went directly underneath, the sheet of
water which formed the cascade. The day had already closed, and it was
now moonlight. On reaching the top, which was eighty feet above the
basin
,
she led him through the low wood of cedars and laurel, and stopping
on the verge of a precipice on the other side bade him look down. He
obeyed her, and saw by the clear light of the moon an extensive valley
below
varied by mound and gave and shining lakes. From the midst, the
blaze of a hundred lodge-fires flashed upon his sight, and far and wide he
discovered the smokes of habitations.
`You see the danger you have exposed yourself to, Natanis,' said the
maiden
earnestly. `Those are the national lodges of the Nerijewecs. That
lodge to the right, not far distant, is that of Canassa. Remain here until I
return for you; for you and my father must not meet before I have placed in
your path the calumet of peace.'
As she spoke, she left him and descended the precipice by a path-way
leading down into the valley at his feet. In a few moments he saw her light
form in motion in the direction towards the lodge of Canassa.
CHAPTER V.
The Lover's Plot.
Whatsoever
was the nature of the interview between the fair Willewa
and her father, the result did not answer her hopes and wishes. She
returned
to Natanis with a sad countenance, and told him that he must not
linger in the hunting-grounds of his foe, for the spirit of Canassa was
unyieldingly
hostile towards him. She informed him that, owing to the
absence
of her father with his warriors, the presence of the Abanaquis
hunt-
ting parties in his territories had not yet been discovered, and she
eloquently
urged him to leave with his parties at once, ere an encounter
with
people of her nation should render any reconciliation between them
hopeless. The maiden then bade him return to the lodge and warn
his friend, and leave with him in the canoe in the morning, giving
directions
by which he could reach the Keunebis by water. She
him to retire to a lodge she also had near her father's and promising
him in the morning at dawn.
`You will not be interrupted to-night, Natanis,' she said, `so you
remain secure in the lodge with Ayane. No warrior of our tribe
enters
the glen of the Cascades after night-fall. This place is sacred to
daughter of their Chief.'
The next morning the maiden appeared at dawn in the door of
.
She was happy at finding her patient quite refreshed and strong,
from pain. In a few minutes Natanis took leave of the lovely
leaving her his heart, and bearing hers away with him. He left
by a narrower inlet than that by which he had entered it, and in
launched his light canoe upon the dark waters of the swiftly
flowing
nebis. At noon he had restored Ayane to the lodge of his family,
ing him under the fond care of a maiden of his tribe, scarcely less
than the daughter of Canassa, he turned back to follow again his
party. It was not until the next day that he fell in with them at
the
rendezvous
he had appointed, when, joining them they pursued the
the mountains of the wilderness.
The passion of Natanis for the beauteous Willewa grew strong
day, and he resolved in his heart that if Canassa refused him her
marriage, he would, with her consent, make her his bride by
Her image filled his thoughts during all his hunting excursions,
mantic was the influence of his love for her, and whatever belong
upon his mind, that he forbade, for the sake of Neta, any of his
slaying a doe. His warriors readily obeyed him, for he had related
when assembled around the fires of their common hunting-lodge
of his adventures, and how the fair daughter of Canassa had saved
of Ayane who was greatly beloved by all his companions. And when
Natanis
,
after reciting to them, with all the eloquence of love, the tale
hospitality, and impassionedly deseribing her grace, beauty and
told them that he intended to make her his bride, they clashed their hunting
spears together in rude acclamations, and shouted aloud the names of
Natanis
and Willewa.'
The idea of uniting the two tribes under their own chief was
to these warriors; for they knew that when Canassa should die,
would be in the hands of the Abanaquis. The union, there
might be agreeable to the tribe of Natanis, would, for the same
likely to be opposed by the equally haughty and ambitious braves
.
now given an account of the manner in which our hero first met
lovely Willewa, we will return to the thread of our story which we
interrupted for this purpose, and let the Indian girl explain in her own
Natanis, her object in seeking him at his lodge.
had planted his lodge there two nights before for the purpose of
the object of his love, and frequently enjoying her society, which
by secretly visiting her at the fountain, though running great risks
very; for, as the invasion of his hunting-grounds by the young
Abanaquis
chief and his party had been discovered by Canassa, his hunters
instantly
on the alert. To be thus near Willewa, Natanis had se
his own warriors at their national lodges, not telling them whither
going, keeping his secret even from his friend Ayane, well knowing
try to dissuade him from exposing himself to the chance of falling
hands of the Nerijewecs. The place he had selected was on the
of his own hunting-grounds, and he chose it for its beauty and se
more than for its safety; for he had boldly raised his lodge on the
of the river, though the spot was shut in by lofty, wooded hills. At
he is introduced to the reader standing in the door of his cabin,
two months had elapsed since he first beheld Willewa. During this
had met six or seven times, the last time, the evening before at the
.
motive which governed Natanis in fixing his abode there, so near
council-fires of his foes, was with the intention of inviting Canassa to
see him for the purpose of making proposals for a reconciliation,
union with his daughter. To bring about this end it was decided
the lovers that Willewa should the next day prevail on her father
her alone in his war-canoe from the valley of Lodges into the
if for an excursion merely for her gratification; and that when
in the river she should allure him along the banks until they came
the lodge of Natanis, which she should discover with an excla
if she was not aware of its existence; that Natanis should not be
time, but concealed in the grove, and that she should propose to
to land and visit it. Natanis was then to approach and surprise
and invite the haughty Canassa to accept his hospitality. Wille
to place herself between Natanis and her father to prevent any hos
should the latter show himself disposed to show battle, and as a
, mediator endeavor to make them sitdown together as host and guest,
effected without weapons drawn by him, she and Natanis both
would open a way to a final and permanent reconciliation. Wil
not, of course to let the old Chief suspect she had ever seen the
before.
was the plan upon which they had the last night parted, and it was
been carried into effect that day if possible; but, should Natanis
her during the day it was settled that he was again to visit her at the
in the evening to ascertain what obstacle had intervened. He
, about to proceed to the interview, having had that day, as
and Sharp Knife, instead of the fair Willewa and Canassa,
discovered her standing in the moonlight in front of his lodge.
sat by his side upon the bear-skin he had placed for her outside
, her small hand fluttering as as he held it in his, and her young
heaving with agitation, and the speed with which she had hastened
.
speak Willewa, what have those two little cherries to talk about?
Had thy father discovered that an Abanaquis has dared to plant his lodge
within sight of the smokes of his council fires, and do you hasten to bid me
fly? I have waited all day, gentle Fawn of my breast; and my eyes have
never ceased watching for thee and Canassa. Impatient, I crossed the river
in my canoe an hour before sunset and followed the trail to thy lodges for a
mile, and then returned disappointed. On my way, I pursued thy father's
game, and slew even a bear that came upon me suddenly. But the skins of
the stag and wild-beast shall be offered to Canassa to-morrow, if he comes
with thee. Why has not my dark-eyed turtle-dove brought with her the
chief of the Nerijewecs to be the guest of Abanaquis?'
`Natanis, the Chief Canassa has this day been holding a council of war,
and he would not listen to the voice of a woman. The words of Willewa
could not enter the ear of the warrior who discoursed only of hattle.'
`Ha! does the Nerijewec sharpen the war-hatchet?' cried Natanis with
surprise, his eyes kindling with courage and the thoughts of battle. `Does
Canassa's war face turn towards the Lodges of the Abanaquies?'
`No, Natanis. My father has no desire to war with thee for thy invasion
of his hunting-grounds; for he regards it but a just retaliation for a like act
of his own hnuters. Though, said he to me, I cannot he the friend of
the Abanaquis, I do not wish to go to war with him. Let the Kennebis flow
ever between us, and its waters shall be as the waters of peace to our
borders
.
Perhaps I contributed to this spirit of forbearance,' added Willewa,
`for I discoursed with him of all the long existing feud between our people,
and endeavored to inspire in him thoughts of peace. I even said to him,'
continued the lovely maiden blushing at her own earnestness and sincerity
`that he should not only seek peace with you, but try to bring together the
two tribes, that by union they might gain strength.'
`And did my Singing Robin hint to him
how
that union might be brought
about?' said Nataniswith a smile, as he gently laid his hand upon her
polished
brow, and looked with eloquent love into the deep, dark fountains of
her eyes.
Willewa replied by a slightly reproving look, and her eyes sought the
ground.
`Who, then, fair Star of my soul? who then is Canassa to go to was
with?'
`With the Bostonee.'
`The white brothers upon our borders,' cried Natanis with surprise.
`Has the English king sent Canassa a war belt filled with gold as he has
done to Sahatis? How know you this, Willewa?' he asked with animation,
his previously tender, playful manner suddenly changed to one of earnest
and serious interest in what she said.
`The great Sachem of the English has sent one of his chiefs to my
father
and bade him speak fair words to Canassa. Canassa lent his ears to
him, and the white chief and my father smoked together and Canassa
pledged
to the English himself and his warriors. This took place six weeks ago,
Natanis, though I only knew it to-day through my father.'
`This is news, Willewa! what is Canassa's intention? Will he seek the
habitations of the Bostonees? He cannot reach them without crossing the
hunting-grounds of the Abanaquis.'
`Your speech and looks, Natanis, make me tremble, while they assure me,
also, that you are not the enemy of the Bostonees. If Canassa seeks the
habitations of the white settler to war with them, and he crosses your
territories
,
I fear that there will be strife between thee and him. Whatever
happen
,
let there be peace, Natanis. But he will not seek the Pale-face. The
Pale face seeks the Indian in his homes.'
`For thy sake, my gentle doe, I will be at peace. But you have not told
me all. What mean your words? What more is on thy tongue?'
`To-daythis morning, when I sought my father's lodge to allure him
hither, as our plan was, I found him surrounded by his warriors, and
holding
council; while in their midst stood an Indian of the Damaresc nation
one of the swift runners of that sea-board tribe!'
`Why was he in the lodge of the Nerijewec?' demanded Natanis quickly.
`He had come to tell my father that three days before, he had seen from a
high hill, a fleet of many of the white-winged canoes of the Pale-face enter
the river, even the Kennebis on whose banks we now stand! That these
ships bore the scarlet-belted flag of the Bostonees, and that he counted upon
the decks, as they sailed up the river, more than a thousand warriors!'
`A thousand Bostonce warriors!' repeated Natanis starting to his feet with
surprise! `said the Damaresc runner this?'
`He told this to my father; and further, that the fleet had stopped two
hours journey below the falls of Cushnoc, there to build batteaux to ascend
the river further. That he there left them, and hastened to Canassa us the
Chief of a powerful tribe, to communicate the intelligence. My father,
therefore, called a council of war, and as he believes that the Bostonees seek
to possess themselves of his territories, he has unburned the war-hatchet,
and is to day assembling his braves to defend his lodges and his
hunting-grounds
.'
Natanis listened with surprise until she had ended, and then remained
thoughtful and silent. He could not realize that the Americans, with whom
he and the Indian tribes had been so long at peace, could so treacherously
come upon them to surprise and destroy them.
`This expedition of war-canoes,' he said with spirit, `cannot be against
me, if against Canassa, as I have made no compact with their foes, the
British
.
The great Sachem of Boston knows the Abanaquis is not his foe.
Thou tremblest for thy father! Fear thee not, Willewa; I will see the Chief
of these white warriors in person, and know if danger menaces the
Nerijewec
.
But how is it that the Damaresc tribe, who are friends, like Canassa,
to the English Sagamore, how is it that it has been passed by, unmolested?
The Kenuebis, up which they have ascended so far, flows past many a lodge
of the Damarese warriors. Yet said he that they had been harmed?'
`No, Natanis; I have yet more to tell thee,' she added, embarrassed; `did
I but know that thou wert truly the friend of the Bostonee.'
`I love not the white man, Willewa, as if he were of my own race. They
are stronger than we, and by and by will overrun us, and we shall be as the
leaves of the last year. Yet I would not war against them, be cause one of
them has been my friend. Dost thou love the Bostonee?'
`I do, Natanis. Listen to my words. Four years ago I went with my
father to the great council of Lodges at the home of the Sachem of Boston.
My father and other warriors went up to hold a council with the white Chief.
There I was taken into the great Chief's lodge, and his daughter loved me,
and told me she was my white sister. She was fair as the lilly, with soft
eyes, like the sky in color, and shining hair flowing upon her shoulders like
the golden tresses of the water-telossa, when the autumn frost dies them
with gold. Her voice was like the song of the Letel in the morning, and
her laugh rung in the ears of Willewa like the wild melody of the birds of
her native woods. Willewa gave the fair daughter of the great white
Sachem
all her heart, and loved to sit upon a silken cushion at her feet and
listen to her.'
`Could she speak thy tongue with thee, Willewa?' asked Natanis.
`Not all the words; but what her lips failed to say, her eyes and smiles
more eloquently expressed.'
`What said this blue eyed maiden of the Pale-faces to thee, as thou did'st
sit at her feet?'
`She asked me if I loved my father. I told her that he was dearer to me
than any on eon earth,'
`Would'st thou answer her so now, bride of my heart?' inquired Natanis
with mingled tenderness and pride.
`Nay, Natanis; then I did not know thee to love thee,' she answered with
artless sincerity, and lifting to his face her large, gazelle-like eyes with
maidenly
joy. `She then asked me why I loved my father; and when I told
her, she said, and sweetly she said it,
`If you love thus your father, Willewa, because he is kind, and grants
you all your wishes, should you not love more, Him who bestows upon you
your father?'
`She alluded to the Great Spirit, Willewa,' observed Natanis, reverently
laying his hand upon his heart and looking upward with awe to the deep
blue sky, through which the moon was sailing in her silvery car of light,
and over which were spangled a thousand stars, and where, to the eye of
the simple son of the forest, God dwelt in majesty and glory!
`I answered her that I loved the Great Spirit, and that I worshipped him.
She then began to tell me more than my heart could hold, of the majesty,
and power, and goodness of the Great Spirit! She told me how He first
made men good, with gentle hearts, and without a spirit of war and hatred
That there was no enmity then in men's hearts; only love and peace dwelt
there. But man disobeyed and fell under the displeasure of the Great
Spirit
;
and when he would have destroyed him, his Son interceded, and for his
sake, the Great Spirit spared us! She told me that from that time all the
blessings
we have on earth, and all our hopes of dwelling in a land of peace and
love beyond the setting sun, after death, we owe to the love of the Son for us.
That the sun and, moon, and stars shine for us, on His account, for we have
not deserved them on our own; that the seasons roll round, the fruits put
forth, the forests give shade and verdure, that deer and other game are
bestowed
upon us for food, and that all our enjoyments came to us through this
good Son of the Great Spirit! This Son, she told me, was all love and
benevolence
and peace, and all his desire in return for his goodness to us is,
that we should be like him.'
After this manner did Willewa discourse for several minutes longer to
Natanis, narrating to him in eloquent words the entire outline of the
Christian
atonement as it had been taught her by the daughter of the governor on
her visit to Boston. Natanis listened with deep attention. When she had
ended, he said,
`Did not the French Priest, fatherRalle, teach some of your tribes
this?'
`He did, I believe; but I had not been taught it by my father.'
`Is Willewa a Christian?'
`She believes in the Son of the Great Spirit answered the Indian maiden
with touching fervor. `Will Natanis believe?'
`Natanis knows that his father adored the Great spirit of the skies! whom
they
worshipped,
he
will worship. But I will hear thee speak more of this,
Willewa. What you believe, I do not fear to believe. It is for this, then
you are the friend of the Bostonee?'
`I love the daughter of the great Sachem, for she taught me that which
is to make me happy here, and beyond the setting sun, and which I shall
love to teach thee Natanis; it is a faith that will surely find a home in your
noble bosom! For
her
sake are the Bostonees my friends! What says
Natanis? Are they
his?
' she asked, looking up into his face with gentle
earnestness.
`They are
my
friends, also, Willewa.'
`If need be, will Natanis, for
my
sake, do them service as brothers?'
3
`I will even unbury the war-hatchet in their defence if you command
me. The friends of Willewa, are the friends of the Abanaquis.'
`Then Natanis, I can trust thee with what more I have in my heart, and
which my ears heard in the lodge of Canassa. The Damaresc had not
been long arrived and given his message, when a second brave of the
Kennebis
tribe came running, and stood before the council. He said that he
had been among the tents of the white-warriors as they encamped upon the
river, and that their chief had told him he sought peace with all the tribes.
Their object, he said, was not to make war upon the Indians, but they were
only marching through their hunting-grounds, and ascending the Kennebis
for the purpose of reaching the great fortress of Quebec, where the great
English chief holds his councils, hoping to fall upon it by surprise.'
Natanis uttered an exclamation of astonishment. He stood a moment
silent
,
and then said impressively,
`This is great news, Willewa!'
`So my father seemed to regard it. He has been in secret council with
his warriors ever since. I waited till night only to fly hither to tell thee
what events have taken place!'
`They are great events, Willewa! Thanks for this promptness in
coming
to me! Do you know ought of Canassa's intentions!'
`Nothing! only, as I left, there were great preparations of a war-like
nature
going on in the Valley of Lodges!'
`He must contemplate attacking them.'
`The Bostonees are my friends! they are
theirs
, also, Natanis! This must
not be.'
`Willewa! Canassa is a great Chief and a brave warrior. He is the friend
of the English. He will stand in the path of the Bostonee! How shall
Natanis prevent it? Must the Abanaquis war with the Nerijewec? For thy
sake he cannot. Yet, as thou sayest, Canassa must not cross the path of our
friends. I am glad to know, Willewa, that this expedition is undertaken. I
am glad that the power of the English sachem is menaced! Willewa, if I
will swear not to encounter thy father in battle, will you give me
permission
to act as becomes the friend of the great Sagamore of Bostonee? If
Canassa menaces them in their passage up the Kennebis, and sees that I am
at the head of my warriors also, to befriend them, it may check him in his
purposes, and thus the attack he doubtless meditates be prevented. He is
bound to stop them, by his compact with the English. Yet I may restrain
him by the presence of my own warriors.'
`I consent, Natanis; only meet not face to face with my father, save in
peace. Behold in Canassa's face the features of Willewa, and spare him.'
`I swear it, Willewa, by the Great Spirit! Now that
we
are both friends
of the Bostonee, foes of the English, let us act, then, as becomes us! Come
my gentle roe of the Fountain! I will accompany thee back to thy lodge,
and then must I seek my warriors.'
CHAPTER VI.
The Spies.
Scarlet Feather
launched his canoe from the green sward, upon which
it was lying, and placing the lovely Indian maiden therein, seized the
carved
paddle, and shot out into the arrowy current. In a few minutes he
reached
the opposite shore, and drawing the canoe underneath the foliage of
the bank, where it would lie concealed, he prepared to accompany Willewa
through the forest paths to her lodge.
`Nay, Natanis,' she said, laying her hand upon his arm. `You are already
far enough in the hunting-grounds of Canassa. The warriors of my people
are in action, and their war-parties may be crossing our path at this moment.
Return, Natanis! Reach speedily your own territories, arouse your warriors
and prepare to defend the Pale-faces, our friends. But let not Natanis and
Canassa meet in battle.'
`Never will the Abanaquis look upon the chief of the Nerijewecs, the
father of Willewa, as his foe. I promise thee that I will not let my favor
towards
the Bostonee bring me into a war with Canassa.'
`I ask no more, Natanis! Now hasten. If anything occurs that you
should know, I will send thee word. There is one Indiana youth whom
I can trust to bear a message. If one comes to thy lodges, wearing bound
upon his brow this girdle of wampum, you will know he is a messenger from
Willewa.'
Natanis accompanied the maiden some distance farther, and then parting
from her, retraced his steps towards the river. He thought deeply, as he
went, upon the news that he had received. Although not inclined to enter
into this quarrel between the English and the colonists, and originally
intending
to remain passive, nevertheless he had a predilection in favor of the
latter, and a strong prejudice against the former; sufficient motives, in
combination
,
to lead him, under suitable inducements, to take part in the
conflict
,
and throw his influence on the side of `the Bostonees,' as the New
Englanders were denominated. This inducement was the desire of
Willewa
that he should be their friend; for her deep gratitude to the lovely
Christian
daughter of the governor of Massachusetts, extended to the whole
people
,
and in her heart she regarded every Bostonee as the brother of her
benefactress
.
These were the deep feelings that led the Indian girl to seek to
enlist Natanis in their cause, when she found that they were likely to be
attacked
by the Nerijewees. The struggle in her heart was a painful one. It
was a struggle between parental love, and gratitude to her who opened to
her the knowledge of the way of life! the latter prevailed in her heart.
But then came another struggle, scarcely less painful. It was whether she
should place Natanis in a hostile position to her father, that the intentions of
Canassa against the ascending army might not be carried into effect. She
felt, as Natanis had suggested, that if he assumed a bold stand with his eight
hundred warriors on the flank of the Bostonees between their line of march
and Canassa's force, that the latter would not venture the battle, and so the
army might pass on securely. Nevertheless, she saw with grief, that this
position would widen the breach between them, even though no battle
should come of it! But her desire to befriend the people of her Christian
teacher, indnced her to run even the risk of a battle, trusting to Natanis's
promise that he would not cross her father's path. She had, however, a
hope at her heart, the realization of which, she trusted, would render all
safe. With this hope, giving lightness and speed to her steps, she hurried
along the gloomy glades of the forest, in the direction of the Lodge of her
father.
In the meanwhile Natanis followed the path towards the river, from which
he had gone half a mile in attendance upon Willewa. He had made up his
mind, immediately on reaching his national Lodges, to despatch Ayane
secretly
to the Bostonee General to inform him of the hostile attitude
assumed
by Canassa, and put him on his guard against any attack. While he
was forming this plan in his mind, he saw two figures before him at some
distance, crossing a moonlit space in the forest, and disappearing again in its
recesses. They seemed to him, to be bearing a canoe between them.
Supposing
them to be some of Canassa's people, he hastened forward to see
whither they were going, at once suspecting them of being on their way to
take the river to descend it, and spy out the movements of the enemy; or it
might be the Damaresc and Kennebis messengers returning. He struck
through the forest higher up than he had seen them, intending to strike their
trail obliquely. In about ten minutes he fell in with it, and then followed
it with that caution, and unerring certainty, characteristic of his race. He
saw by the pressure of the grass, and the bent shrubs which had not yet
recovered
their erect from again after being pressed down by their fect, that
they were but two or three minutes before him; and had these failed, the
very air to his keen senses had betrayed their recent passage; for as he
inhaled
it, he felt that it had not, many seconds before, been exhaled by
human
beings. He proceeded with the steady, stealthy pace of a panther
following
his prey, until the bright, moonlit river came in sight through the
forest
trees; and by the bluffs on the opposite bank, he recognized the spot to
be a mile above his lodge. Wondering, if those he pursued were to descend
the river in the boat they carried on their shoulders, they should have gone
so high up, he carefully advanced from the wood and saw them standing
upon the bank. He approached them tree by tree, concealing himself as he
advanced, until he was within a few yards of them. To his surprise, he then
saw that they were Sabatis and Sharp Knife. They had laid down their
birchen canoe close to the water's edge, and seating themselves upon the
grass, with their backs against a large sycamore, began to light their pipes
and smoke while they rested.
Natanis, after hearing the news brought him by Willewa, had recalled his
brother's visit and manner, and the thought that his movements might have
had some connection with the appearance of the Colonial army in the
wilderness
,
forced itself strongly upon his mind: and the more he reflected
upon his brother's words to him, the more he was impressed with the belief
that he not only knew the ascent of the army, but that he was acting
treacherously
in reference to it. Upon now seeing them here his suspicions were
confirmed. He, therefore, hearing them talking together, cautiously moved
forward, creeping upon the ground with noiseless advance, until he was
within three length of his hunting-spear of the spot where they reclined
with their backs to the forest. He listened with the deepest attention, for
he hoped to discover by their words their treachery, whatever it might be,
or whomsoever might be its victim.
`That canoe ar'nt the lightest one I ever did handle, sagamore,' said Sharp
Knife, as he drew his first whiff of tobacco smoke deliberately through the
stem of his pipe, and then blew it a yard out from his lips in a straight line,
a favorite way he had of smoking. `It is a long tramp, four miles through
the woods with such a load. We have, however, completely blinded
Natanis
.
It would'nt have done to let him know our business.'
`Natanis will soon hear that the pale-faces are below. He will then
suspect
our mission,' answered Sabatis, placing his tomahawk to his lips, the
handle of which was perforated like a pipe tube, and the head of it hollowed
to form a bowl.
`True! but we shall have gone on beyond his reach. What I was afraid
of was, that if he guessed we were hurrying forward to give intelligence to
Governor Carlton of the approach of the Colonists, he would try and stop
us. He could easily have done it by sending a score of his braves after
us.'
`It was for this reason I was not more plain in my interview with him.
I was afraid the Abanaquis would possess my secret, and then use it to favor
the Bostonees.'
`Well, Sagamore, we are well escaped from him. In ten minutes let us
push on up stream. We have no time for delay. The sooner we reach
Quebee with the news, the greater will be our service done, and the heavier
the gold in our belts.'
`Sabatis does not this service for gold,' answered the Sagamore proudly.
`I am the friend of the great Sachem Carlton, and I do it to serve him, as
one Chief serves another, in alliance with him. Sabatis does not this for
gold! The Tarratine is a warrior, not a merchant.'
`Them may be your sentiments, Sagamore, but not mine, I can tell you!
If I did'nt expect a belt full of English guineas, I would'nt take another step
north. The colonists might march in silence, and come popping down out
of the wilderness upon the fortress of Quebec like a flight of eagles upon
a lion's lair. It's nat'ral for white men to love gold, and I consider myself a
white, though I was raised a Injun! Do you think, Sagamore, the Chief
Canassa will take part in this affair? You know he has pledged his faith to
the English, as well as you.'
`Canassa is an independant Sagamore, and will act as he sees fit. Though
we are both allies of the English, we are not friends to each other.'
`True. I know the Tarratines and Abanaquies have little love for the
Nerijewec. It is my opinion Canassa would anticipate us if he knew our
mission; for he would like this opportunity of securing the good will of the
English. You have done right, Sagamore, to go yourself in person. It
will enable you to secure on the spot what reward you want for your
services
.
Governor Carlton will see at a glance the great service you will have
done him in giving him timely notice of the advance of a foe in this
direction
.'
`I shall ask only for the hunting-ground of the Nerijewecs. These were
once part of the territories of the Tarratine nation, and were wrested from
us by rebellion in the tribe, when the oldest forest tree upon them was a
sapling.'
`What will you do with Canassa, and his people?'
`The English must find other lands for them. Let Canassa drive out the
Damaresc and Kennebis if he will have new hunting-grounds.'
`Canassa will fight to the last for his lands,' answered Sharp Knife.
`Come, Sagamore! It is time we pushed forward.'
`I have been thinking, Sharp Knife, that if Natanis finds I have left
orders
for war-parties of my braves to molest and obstruct the passage of the
Bostonees as much as they can, he may bring his warriors into their aid, and
war with mine.'
`Let him, Sagamore! It will only weaken his own power. His
warriors
now, are three hundred less than yours. If Natanis is slain, you are
Chief of both tribes.'
`But if Natanis and my warriors come to battle on this quarrel, Natanis
and Canassa will surely be friends and unite their warriors against me and
mine.'
`The Abanaquis and the Nerijewec never can be allies, Sagamore. Their
hatred is too long lived.'
`If Natanis and I are at war, Canassa finding he is to be driven from his
hunting-grounds that I may occupy them, will make proposals of union
with Natanis.'
`But he will not accept them without some deeper motive than I can now
see at the bottom. The proud Scarlet Feather will never smoke the
calumet
of peace with Canassa. But let us move, Sagamore.'
The majestic Indian Chief rose from the ground, elevating his Herculean
frame to its full height, and casting a quick, searching glance around him,
followed Sharp Knife into the canoe. It soon disappeared with them in the
shadows which overhung the banks of the river. Natanis listened until he
could no longer hear the dip of their paddles as they propelled the little
bark up the current, and then rapidly took his way down the shores of the
stream towards the place where he had left his own boat on debarking with
Willewa. Springing into it, he shot down the river like an arrow, and
leaped
on shore before his hunting-lodge. To his surprise, he was met in the
door by Ayane!
`My Chief, pardon Ayane for hunting you out in your seclusion!' said
the young Indian as he saw Natanis start back with surprise.
`Natanis has nothing to forgive his friend. Why do you seek me?
`I knew that you could only seek the lodges of the Nerijewec that you
might be near the footsteps of the daughter of Canassa. I waited two days
for your return, and fearing for your safety amid your enemies territories, I
sought you.'
`You are welcome, Ayane! I would rather see thee now than any man.
I was hastening to find you.'
`What service can Ayane perform for his chief?'
`Willewa has brought me intelligence to-night that a Damaresc warrior
has been to Canassa's lodge and reported that a thousand warriors of the
Bostonee race are ascending the Kennebis in white-winged canoes. They
are now just below the Cushnoc falls, encamped and building boats to
ascend
higher. You look surprised, Ayane, and grasp your spear firmly!
What think you, is their purpose?'
`I know not, my chief, unless to invade our hunting-grounds,' answered
the young brave with animation.
`Are we not at peace with them?'
`And is not the Abananquis the friend of the Bostonec? What has
Natanis
done, that a thousand warriors should come hither so secretly?'
`They seek not Natanis, brother. Their object is to war upon the
English
.'
`The English have no lodges on the Kennebis!'
`But they have, on the great St. Lawrence. Dost thou not know their
purpose? But, come hither! see'st thou then, this dressed skin? Knowest
thou what these figures I have drawn upon it mean?'
And Natanis displayed to him in the light of the moon, a white deer-skin
on which was drawn with vermillion, a rude but accurate delineation of the
rivers of Maine, of the situation of the Highlands, and the direction of the
Chaudiere into the St. Lawrence.
`I have seen thee make in such a manner the lines of your
hunting-grounds
,
separating them from those around; but I have not seen this
before.'
`This is a map of the Kennebis to its source, and also of the rivers that
flow north, the other side of the mountains of the wilderness. I have been
amusing myself while here, in drawing it, partly from my own observation,
partly from the accounts of my father, and also from what the hunters who
have passed along these rivers have told me. Look you, now, Ayane! You
have asked me why the Bostonee seeks his English foe on the Kennebis.
Here is the sea where the Kennebis loses itself after washing the lands of
the tribe of Kennebis and that of the Damaresc. Now follow the point of
my dagger as I trace upward along this wavy line, which is the river.
From the sea the Bostonee fleet of war-canoes came up to the falls of
Cushnoc
,
where you see I have painted an arrow-head. There they are now
encamped
,
building batteaus to ascend further; for their big war-canoes will
not go higher. Now follow my dagger's point, and I will show you where
they will follow, and whither they go. Here where I detain my dagger and
you see a deer's antler represented is where my lodge now is. There
opposite
,
where I have painted a heart, is the lodge of the fair Willewa, and
beyond it the Lodges of Canassa and his people. Now I ascend the river,
passing fall after fall, till you see I stop and turn aside into another stream.
This is a tributary to the Kennebis. I ascend it so fara half day's journey
and then cross this space, which is forest. If I was in a canoe, I should
have to carry my boat across it eighteen miles. I thus pass the mountains
here, and launch my canoe into this red space which represents the lake
Megantic. It is connected, you see, with another river flowing out of it.'
`That river, I see, flows contrary to the Kennebis,' said Ayane, who,
bending on one knee as Natanis held the skin unrolled upon his, was eagerly
and earnestly regarding the skilfully-drawn map as his chief was pointing
out to him its several parts.
`Yes, it flows northward. It is the Chaudiere. Now follow my finger
down until you see it empties into a river'
`That runs eastward toward the rising sun!' exclaimed Ayane with
surprise
.
`Yes. All rivers do not flow southward like our native Kennebis. This
great river is the St. Lawrence. It flows through the lands of the English
Sachem, and here where you see I have placed a cross is their great Lodge,
Quebec.'
`Quebec!' exclaimed the youthful brave, with surprise.
`What makes Ayane wonder? speak and Natanis will listen,' he said,
seeing
him grave and thoughtful.
`If,' said Ayane placing one finger on the cross, and another at the mouth
of the Kennebis, `there is situated the English Sachem's lodge, and one can
so easily reach it in a canoe from here, why does not the Great Sachem of
Quebec come up the Chaudiere and descend the Kennebis with his
warriors
to attack the Bostonees? If he saw this map, Natanis, he would do it!'
added the youth with sparkling eyes.
`And do you wish it, Ayane? Is the young friend of Natanis the foe of
the Bostonee?'
`No, Natanis. I knew that the English Sachem was at war with them,
and when I saw your rivers here, and beheld how easily he could reach his
foes by passing through the wilderness, I spoke my thoughts.'
`Ayane, I am the friend of the Bostonee. Willewa is their friend. Is
Ayane their foe?' said the Chief with gentle reproach.
`Ayane loves only his chief. His friends are Ayane's friends,' answered
the youth warmly and sincerely.
`Then listen, Ayane. Thy thought has hit the truth, but not in reference
to the English. It is the Bostonee that marches with his warriors through
the wilderness by these rivers. The English Sachem comes not south to
attack Boston, but the Boston Sachem goes north to attack Quebec. It is
for this end that their warriors are now already so far advanced in their
progress through the wilderness. The thought that came to thy mind, came
to them also. Dost thou rejoice at it as much as if it were the English who
were thus in motion?'
`Ayane rejoices with Natanis. If Natanis is glad, so is Ayane. The joys
of his chief are his.'
`Thou knowest, then, why this band of white warriors build their
bat-You
see that it is important the English should be taken by surprise.
Now there have passed up the river to-night two spies, if I may so call
them, who having discovered the approach of the Bostonees, and
ascertained
their intention, have hastened forward to the wilderness to forewarn the
English Sachem at Quebec of the approach of his foes. These spies are
Sabatis, my warlike brother-chief of the Tarratines, and Sharp Knife, a
Pale face who was brought up in his tribe, and whom you have heard of as
a great brave and skilful hunter. Their object I have accidentally
discovered
from their own words. They are now on their way in a canoe, having
got by this time nearly as far as the Sebasticoc rapids, five miles hence.
Remain here, Ayane, and be watchful that you are not surprised by any foe
while I hasten to my Lodges and send thee seven young braves with two
canoes. When they meet you, take to the river, and pursue Sabatis swiftly
and secretly. Overtake him, surprise him and make him and Sharp Knife
prisoner. Injure neither of them, for Sabatis is the brother of Natanis.
Conduct them in safety to my council Lodge, and there guard them until you
see me.'
The next moment they parted, and Natanis, entering the forest, took his
way swiftly towards the beautiful lake among the hills where, clustered in
numerous picturesque villages and hamlets, were congregated the lodges of
his nation.
CHAPTER VII.
Canassa and his Daughter.
Willewa
, after parting with Searlet Feather in the forest, hastened
towards
the Lodge of Canassa for the purpose of seeking an interview with
her father. She soon reached the lake with the island in the centre of it,
upon which Natanis had slain the stag, and springing lightly into her canoe,
which being covered with the shining bark of the birch tree shone like silver
in the moon-beams, and shot rapidly out from the shore. Swiftly the little
shell-shaped vessel flew across the water, Wilewa plying the slender paddle,
displaying an elegance in the pliant motions of her body, as graceful as it
was unstudied.
She entered the dark canal beneath the over-arching foliage on the
farther
side of the lake, and at length landed in the pool into which tumbled
the Cascade of the Glen. Neta met her as her foot touched the shore, and
gave dumb but eloquent signs of joy at seeing her return. Giving the doe
a kind word or two she passed into her lodge, and throwing over her
shoulders
a rich cape of gorgeous feathers, she took the pathway up the marble
precipice along the face of which she had conducted Natanis to show him
the lodges of Canassa, in the valley upon the other side. On reaching the
summit which rose to the height of a hundred feet, forming a sort of
gigantic
wall enclosing her little dell from the plain on the outside, she paused to
look down. The distance to her father's lodge was not thrice a long arrow's
flight from where she stood, and around it at various distances were
gathered
the lodges of his warriors. She discovered that the valley was alive with
preparation. Fires blazed in nearly every lodge, and parties of braves were
assembled in different places, preparing for an immediate war-expedition.
Warriors were bending their bows and fitting arrows to them, or fastening
sharp flint-heads to arrow-shafts; others were stripping the bark from strait
sapplings which they had selected form the forest, and making of them
lance-poles
;
others were painting their faces with war-paint, and others engaged
in mimic battle with each other, the clashing of their tomahawks and spears
mingling with the wild war-whoop filling the plain. It was evident from
all this, that Canassa had not only decided to give battle to the ascending
army
,
but at once throw himself across its path at the head of his warriors.
Casting her eye anxiously upon her father's lodge, which stood apart
from the rest, and conspicuous by its superior height, she saw that the
council
had broken up; for she recognized, even by the moonlight which filled
brightly all the valley, his commanding person standing in front of his
lodge with two warriors whom he seemed to be conversing with. They
soon after left him and he walked slowly up and down in thought. She
was about to descend the path to go and meet him, when a youth not more
than sixteen, with a face as brown as a hazel-nut, eyes very large, black and
sparkling, and a countenance altogether handsome and pleasing, came up
the path from the valley and stood before her. His slender and elegant
figure
was clad in a deerskin frock, girdled at the waist by a showy belt of
wampum, and he wore leggins dyed with scarlet and fringed both around the
bottom and along the seams. He carried in his hand a yew bow painted a
bright blue, and at his back was slung a quiver fancifully ornamented with
shells and feathers. Upon his head was fastened the beak and brown wings
of a bawk, the beak resting above his brow and the wings bound on each
side over his ears were secured behind his head, the whole forming a
costume
both novel and picturesque, and in shape not unlike an ancient
Carthagenian
helmet. Beneath this head-dress waved his raven black hair freely
to his shoulders.
`Neonah, what news? Thou comest hastily, cousin!'
`The Princess Willewa is wanted in the lodge of her father,' said the
young Indian with affectionate respect. `Twice I have sought thee in thy
lodge by his command, and now I was going a third time. Haste, Willewa,
for Canassa is displeased that thou wert not found.'
`Go, cousin Neonah, I follow thee! Does my father march from the
valley
to-night? I see that his warriors are in arms.'
`I do not know the war-councils of the chief and his braves,' answered
the youth in a depressed tone. `I am but a child in the eyes of warriors
and thy father, my chief, regards me only as he regards the maidens of the
tribe. I did ask him to let me go to the battle, and what think you was his
reply?' asked the youth with indignant emotion.
`Nay, I know not, Neonah,' answered Willewa, smilingly, as she
continued
to descend the path a little behind him, he, the while, looking back
over
his shoulder and talking as he went; `I know not, unless he bade thee
wait till thou wert a man!'
`He bade me stay behind and take care of thee and thy doe Neta,' replied
Neona with a look and tone of haughty disdain.
`And what more valuable charge could my father give thee, Neonah?
Whom dost thou love more than thy cousin Willewa, and Neta, I know
thou lovest for Willewa's sake. Thou shouldst be proud of such a charge,
methinks.'
`Nay, I love thee, cousin, and would defend thee with my life from danger.
But am I not destined to be a warrior! Have I not slain as many deer as I
have fingers, and three stags killed with my spear. Have I not battled with
a bear and laid him dead at my feet, and do not the skins of a wolf and
a panther slain by me hang up before the door of my mother's lodge?'
`Be not grieved, Neonah, at my father's words. One day thou wilt be a
warrior and a chief. Stay with me, for I assure thee I would rather depend
on thy arm in any danger than on that of Bokonoco, who calls himself
Black Thunder, notwithstanding he is one of my father's most celebrated
braves. Stay with me, for I have a service for thee to perform worthy even
the best warrior of your tribe!'
`I am content to serve thee, so thou thinkest me no craven with a girl's
heart,' answered Neonah, appeased. `Hither approaches the Chief to meet
thee!'
As he spoke he drew back to let Willewa advance to meet her father, she
having now got into the plain and near his lodge. Canassa advanced
towards
her with a firm step, bearing himself like a king, as he was. There
was a native majesty in his walk, as if he felt conscious of his independance
and power. He was not tall and Herculean like the Sagamore Sabatis, but
in height a little undersized, yet with such symmetry of limb, that the
dignity
and commanding carriage of his figure were not in the least diminished.
He carried his head proudly like a monarch of the new world, and moved
with a stately case that was singularly imposing.
`Daughter, I have thrice despatched a messenger for thee!' he said in a
tone of mingled reproof and affection.
`I have been upon the lake, father,' answered the maiden blushing at the
slight evasion of the whole truth.
`It is dangerous for the dove to be abroad when the hawks are on the
wing,' answered Canassa, laying his hand upon his daughter's shoulder,
and gently resting it there leaned upon it as together they slowly walked
towards his lodge.
`Willewa has no fears!'
`The Abanaquies are near and may pounce upon the bird of Canassa, if it
wander too far from its nest. Dost thou know that one of my people has
discovered on the shores of the Kennebis, not two miles hence an
Abanaquies
hunting lodge.'
`Did he enter it?' she asked tremblingly.
`No. But he knew from its shape that it was erected by one of the
hunters
of Natanis. I have despatched a war-party to see who it is that dare
plant his lodge so boldly within arrow-flight of our banks!'
Willewa prayed in her heart that Natanis had not lingered on his return;
and this belief gave her hope of his safety. She supressed all emotion and
said,
`Father, why should not a hunter of the Abanaquis plant his lodge on the
other side of the Kennebis? They are the hunting grounds of his people.'
`It is a defiance. They will again be hunting deer in my forests.
Natanis
is bold for a young chief, and I will in the outset check his daring and
pride!'
`Hast thou ever seen Natanis, father?'
`No, save when he was a boy, when I met his father in a general council
held upon the council island, in the bay of the river, below us a day's
journey
.
I noted him then as an ambitious and imperious stripling, who even
had the presumption to challenge Bokonoco, my chief warrior, to a trial of
skill with his puppet bow and arrows.'
`That was the wild fancy of the boy. Natanis has the credit now of
wisdom
as a chief, and bravery as a warrior.'
`So men say. But what is he to thee, maiden, that thou speakest so
warmly of him!' and the dark gaze of the chief seemed to penetrate her
soul. `Hast
thou
seen him?'
Willewa dropped her eyes, was silent for a moment, and then looking up
said firmly yet in a low voice:
`I have, father!'
`Where hast thou beheld the foe of Canassa?' demanded the chief,
pressing
the hand he had so gently laid upon her shoulder at the first, so
strongly
into the flesh that she shrunk from it with pain; `tell me,
when
didst thou
meet with the Abanaquis?'
`Hear me, father, in peace,' she said as he released his grasp, and placed
himself before her while she stood in an attitude at once firm and
deprecating
.
`Let the words of Willewa enter your ears and fall upon your heart!'
`Speak! Canassa is ready to hear!' answered the chief sternly.
Willewa rested her hand upon the side of the door-way of the lodge,
before
which both were standing, the moonlight falling bright and purely
upon
her gentle and beauteous countenance, in which love and apprehension
were touchingly mingled. Canassa with haughty surprise, his massive brow
thrown into dark shadow beneath his cap of war-feathers, regarded her
without removing his eyes.
`Father, Willewn speaks! Let her voice sound not to thee as an enemy's
that thou shouldst listen as if thou wert listening to a foe. Whatever I have
done, I am still Willewa.'
The darkness of displeasure passed from the brow of the chief, and he
said in a kind tone,
`Let my child speak. The daughter of Canassa can never have done any
thing unworthy!'
`Thanks, my noble father, for this confidence!'
`When sawest thou the Abanaquis, Willewa?' he said in the same
parental
tone.
`It was thus, my father,' and in a voice that fell like gentle music upon
the ear of Canassa, though the words she uttered pleased him not, and filled
him with surprise, she began relating to him her first meeting with Natanis
and the wounded youth he had borne to her lodge, recounting each
particular
.
Canassa listened to the end without a word by which she could
discover how he was affected. When she concluded by telling him of the
departure of Natanis and Ayane in the morning, he was for a few moments
silent. He walked several times to and fro before his lodge, and then
abruptly
turned and addressed her:
`Hast thou met this Abanaquis since? be true, my daughter. I have not
yet blamed thee for not telling me of the presence of my foe in thy lodge!
I have not asked thee why thou didst not give him up to me; for I know
what is due to the sacred rights of hospitality. Thou didst well in not
betraying
the trust reposed in thee. Thou didst act as became a daughter of
Canassa; for know, that if thou hadst forgotten what was due to a guest,
and had betrayed him to me, I should have let him depart safely,
notwithstanding
his misfortunes were caused by his invasion of my hunting grounds.
Canassa knows the difference between a foe in the battle-field and a foe in
distress. Thou didst so far well; yet, from thy manner and tone and looks,
as thou speakest of him, I had rather thou hadst not seen him, or he thee!
But thou hast not answered me?'
`I have seen him since, father,' she answered with more confidence, yet
still with trembling; for, although her father had taken a view of the first
meeting with Natanis which she had not dared even to anticipate, she still
was doubtful how he might continue to regard the matter.
`Where!' he demanded in a grave, deep voice.
She then told him truly where and when, and fully recounted to him their
interviews, saving only the last, when she had sought him at his lodge, and
saving also the tender love-passages which had characterised them all.
`Why came the Abanaquis a second and third time to visit thee!' he said
seriously.
`Willewa asked him not why he came,' she answered with modest
embarrasment
.
`Told he Willewa why he came?'
`No, father!'
`There was no need, methinks. If hospitallity led thee at the first to
suffer
Natanis to go away in peace, what induced thee the second and
subsequent
times to let him depart without informing me? Came he each time
to thy lodge in distress?'
`Each time, I recollect, he said he came for something he had forgotton
when there last.'
`No doubt he was very forgetful. Perhaps he told thee he had lost his
heart, and came to thee in distress, looking for it. Willewa, if Natanis saw
thee so often, he must have been near thee. Dost thou not know who
dwelt in that lodge upon the western bank of the Kennebis?'
`Scarlet Feather, my father,' she answered with downcast eyes.
`I did suspect as much. Willewa,' he said severely, yet with a tone of
kindness still apparent in the deep sternness of his voice, `thou hast proved
a traitor to thy father and thy tribe! I have read all thy soul as thou wert
speaking to me. Thy heart is given to the Abanaquis, and he has won thy
maiden affections. I see that thou hast in thy bosom a deep interest for
himdeeper than thy trembling lips would fain have kept from me! The
Abanaquis has also proved himself a traitor to me, as well as a foe. Like
the wolf he has stolen into my lodge and robbed me of my pet-fawn! I
know not,' he cried angrily, `I know not which has proved basest, thyself
or the Abanaquis. Nay, throw not thyself upon thy knees at my feet!
Natanis
has kneeled at thine. So kneel not thou to me! Traitress! Friend
of the Abanaquis! Foe of Canassa and thy race! I forgive thee in the
name of hospitality what thou didst do in the first place; I now curse thee
in the name of thy nation what thou hast since done. The first time he was
thy guest. Thence afterwards when he came to thee he was thy father's
foe and thine! Thou shouldst have turned a deaf ear to his voice of
passion
,
and letting the young men of thy tribe know he was with thee, have
let them fall upon him, bound him and brought him before me. He would
not only hunt my deer for me in my forests, but he must afterwards enter
my lodges and steal away my gentle doethe daughter of a king!'
`Father, forgive!' she faltered out clasping her hands upon her bosom.
`Nay! Hear me! Thou hast forgotten the voice of thy father, and
listened
to the tones of that of the Abanaquis. Henceforth thou art a
traitress
in the eyes of Canassa, not thy father, but thy
Chief!
'
`Father! forgive me! It is true my heart hath given itself to Natanis!
Yet he was so brave, so good, so gentle and full of tenderness! He'
`Thou hast asked to be forgiven. Wilt thou do what I command thee to
earn my forgiveness?'
`I will obey thee, father. Command what thou wilt, if it is to bear the
heaviest task thou canst lay upon me. I am willing to be punished by thee
even as one of the humblest daughters of thy people!'
`I punish thee not as I would punish them. Hear Canassa's words.
Natanis
will again visit thee; receive him and let him know nothing of what
has passed between thee and me to-night. When thou hast him in thy
lodge, administer to him a potion such as thou didst give his wounded
friend. Administer it to him subtlely, and let it he so powerful that he may
sleep deeply. When he sleeps then come to my lodge, and if I be not here,
thou wilt find five warriors whom I shall leave behind me to do thy bidding.
Guide them to the sleeping Abanaquis, that they may take him prisoner.
Then, Willewa, shalt thou have thy father's forgiveness. If thou fail and
prove false thou shalt die the death of a traitress, were thou seven times my
daughter!'
`Father! father!'
`No more! I have urgent affairs. Thou knowest the will of Canassa!'
Thus speaking the proud Chief passed onward towards a group of
warriors
whom he saw standing a short distance from him, as if awaiting the
termination
of his interview with his daughter.
`Are my braves all informed of my wish to commence the war-march in
the morning?' he inquired of a chief upon whose black and savage features
every passion of his wild race was strongly impressed; a man whose
costume
was a bearskin thrown about his body, and whose black hair floated
fiercely about his bull-like neck; whose only weapon was a huge knotted
pine club, and whose voice as he replied, sounded like the muttered roar of
a lion.
`They are all at work preparing for war, my chief. There are some
hunting
parties yet abroad beyond the lake, but I have despatched runners to
bring them in.'
`You have done well, Bockonoco! You will hear now my plans to
thwart these pale-faces, and be faithful to the English Sachem. I shall
follow
the river down myself with five hundred braves, and take a position at
the Cushnoe falls, filling the surrounding wood with my warriors. You
will follow and take a position higher up so that those batteaux which
escape
me will fall in with you if they continue to ascend the river. It is my
intention to throw myself directly in their path, and dispute the passage at
the falls. At this place they will more readily fall a prey to us, as they will
be troubled in working their boats to get past the rapids. This will be the
moment of attack.'
Canassa's words were received by Boconoko with a savage roar of
satisfaction
,
and by the other chiefs with demonstrations of joy. Their eyes
flashed with warlike fire, and their faces lighted up with the anticipation of
the excitement of battle. Canassa after going round the war-lodges, at
length returned to his own where he had left Willewa, weeping and
sorrowful
.
He did not find her there now, and supposing she had sought her
own lodge, he threw himself upon his bearskin couch, and soon fell
asleep.
CHAPTER VIII.
The Camp.
We
now change the scene of our story from the forest solitudes in which
we have so long lingered with the hunter and the warrior, to the camp of
the American army, whose sudden appearance on the waters of the
Kennebis
had produced such a sensation among the warlike tribes upon its banks.
The brilliant successes of Montgomery in Canada, his capture of
Montreal
,
and the subsequent capitulation of the most part of Upper Canada,
had drawn from Quebec most of the British strength to act against him,
and oppose his triumphant march towards that citadel. General
Washington
with that circumspective eye with which he regarded all the military
movements of the enemy, foreseeing that the whole of the disposable force
of the British army in Canada, would thus be concentrated upon Montreal,
projected an expedition against Quebec. He was at the time in his camp
before Boston. No sooner had he conceived this bold idea than he
privately
detached a large body of troops from his army, and giving the command
of them to Benedict Arnold, he directed him to reach Quebec by the way
of the Kennebec river, passing through the immense wilderness of forests
lying between the sea board of Maine and the St. Lawrence.
The main object held in view by Washington in proposing this hardy
expedition
,
was for the purpose of taking possession of Quebec; although he
hoped also to effect by it a diversion in favor of General Montgomery, who
was in the upper country with his army held in check by Carleton.
Washington
had obtained such information in reference to the condition of
Quebec
as to feel confident that it would be wholly unable to hold out against
such a force as he might send to appear before it. He felt assured, not
without good grounds, that it would surrender at once if attacked by an
American army before the return of Governor Carleton and his forces.
The detachment which Washington sent on this hazardous enterprise
consisted of about one thousand men, mostly New England militia, with a
company of artillery, and three companies of riflemen. This force set sail
from Newburyport in the middle of September in eleven transports, and
entered
the Kennebec on the third day afterwards. They ascended the river
slowly in their vessels until they reached a point where it was deemed
advisible
by General Arnold to debark and construct batteaux for ascending
the river higher; the first rapids, called by the Indians the Cushnoc
Falls, being six miles above them,
*
*
At Augusta, the Capital of Maine, a city, at the time of our story a wilderness, now
celebrated
for the romantic beauty of its situation, the tasteful appearance of its private residences, the
clegance of its public buildings, and the refinement and hospitality of its citizens.
where a block house, called Fort
Weston
,
had already been erected for the protection of the traders, and
overawing
the surrounding Indians.
We regret to have to say that this fine old relic of the past has recently been wantonly
destroyed
by some person, notwithstanding that the citizens of Augusta had long felt a just and
honorable pride in its preservation.
While the batteaux, two hundred in
number
,
were being constructed, Arnold proceeded up the river to Cushnoc
rapids
,
and there established his head quarters in a house still standing on the
east bank of the river, a mile above Augusta.
The batteaux were at length completed and being brought up the river to
Fort Weston, Arnold prepared to re-embark his army. It was on the
evening
previous to the morning set by him for this purpose that a single canoe
might have been seen descending the river close in with the shore. It
contained
two persons who skillfully guided the trail bark through the leaping
waters of the Cushnoc rapids. The moon had already risen and guided
them by her light in their dangerous voyage past many a frowning rock,
and through many a narrow shute, obstructed by the trunks of fallen trees.
As the voyagers came in sight of the block-house, on the level point of
land below the rapids, and discerned the hundred camp fires of the army of
the Americans, the one in the stern who directed the course of the boat
spake and said quickly, yet with courage,
`We are quite far enough down, Neonah. Let us turn the canoe in shore
and secrete it under the overhanging branches.'
The speaker was Willewa. She was dressed almost precisely like
Neonah
,
only her dark tresses were concealed beneath a close hunting cap of
otter skins adorned with a scarlet feather, a gift from Natanis. Neonah
turned
the prow of the light bark shore-ward, and in a few moments
afterwards
both landed under the dark canopy of the trees that thickly grew
upon
the banks. Neonah having concealed the boat turned to his mistress
and said,
`Now whither shall we go to find the great Bostonee Sachem?'
`We must follow the river side until we find a path-way between two
oaks. This will lead us to the lodge in which dwells the chief I seek.
Such were the directions I got from the Kennebis whom we met this
afternoon
.'
`Wherever Willewa goes, Neonah attends her!' answered the young
Indian
with devotion.
They continued along the shore but a short distance before they descried
two vast oaks overhanging the water, between which they discovered a path
ascending from the river.
`It is here, Neonah. The Kennebis brave did not deceive us. He would
not have told me so truly had he known that we were the friends of the
white-warrior. Now let us move swiftly and cautiously; for we may
be surprised ere we can get into the presence of the chief!'
In front of a large square house rudely built, yet imposing in height and
size for a frontier habitation, two officers were walking together up and
down in the pleasant moonlight. One of them was a tall strongly framed,
bold tooking man, with an eagle eye, a prominent Roman nose, and a
countenance
expressing altogether great firmness and military courage. It was
Colonel or General Arnold. He was habited in a long grey surtout, with
an upright collar, a plain chapeau with a cockade, and Hessian boots. His
body was loosely girded by a black, glazed belt, which held a sword and a
single pistol. In his hand he held a small willow switch with which, as he
perambalated up and down, he continually whipped the polished leg of his
military boot. The person by his side was a stout frank looking gentlemen
in a green hunting coat, lined and collared with fur, buff leathern breeches,
and military boots. He wore a foraging cap, and a red sash with a sword,
and a brace of pistols. His address was that of an accomplished gentleman,
his air that of a daring and brave soldier. It was Captain Morgan of the
Rifle Corps, who subsequently in the course of the war, so distinguished
himself at the head of his riflemen. He was smoking a cigar with an easy
careless air, and occasionally stopping to pat upon the head a fine
Newfoundland
dog, which walked with a slow and stately step, up and down by
his side.
`There can be no difficulty in taking the citadel of Quebec if we can
surprise
it,' said Arnold pursuing the conversation which engaged them. `To
take the garrison suddenly by surprise is my aim. This, however, will be
prevented if by any means the chiefs of the hostile Indians in our course
should send forward information. This is what I fear.'
`There is no doubt that the Nerijewecs are in the favor of the British.
They are a powerful tribe and lay directly before us.'
`I should like to know the feelings of the equally powerful Abanaquies,'
said Arnold thoughtfully.
`We have been told they are friendly.'
`It is doubtful. These Indian warriors act by impulses. If, by chance,
one tribe should dispute our way, and with any success, the other tribes
would rush in to assist in destroying us. But if we were conquerors, they
would all stand aloof.'
`Is there no prospect of being able to conciliate Canassa as you have
done the chiefs of the Damaresc and Kennebis tribes?'
`I fear not. I shall, however, soon learn from the party I despatched to
him this morning offering peace.'
`Have you also sent to know the feelings of Natanis, the chief of the
Abanaquies
?'
`No. I was told by General Washington that we should probably find in
him an ally. But, as I said, this was only a conjecture, based upon the fact
that when the English proposed to him terms of alliance, he proudly refused
to listen to them!'
`There is no probability that the Indians will offer to molest us; though,
if they did but know it, we should be completely in their power as we
advanced
deeper into the wilderness. They could attack us when we were
divided in passing the rapids, and do us infinite mischief!'
`The only thing I fear from them is that they may send messengers
forward
to Quebec, and so prepare them for our coming!'
`
If
we do ever get there!' said Captain Morgan. `The truth is I
question
very much if we ever see the citadel of Quebec by this route.'
`Let such doubts be whispered only, sir,' said Arnold. `I know well the
difficulties of the way, but I am as confident I shall see the waters of the
St. Lawrence within three weeks, as that I now behold those of the
Kennebis
flowing past!'
`Do you know I mistrust that Tarratine Chief and his long-sided friend
Sharp-knife, that came into our camp three nights ago and made such
professions
of friendship. You know that the next morning they were not to
be found!'
`Because they left on a mission of my own!'
`Where did you send them?'
`To watch Canassa, and see that he did not send forward any messenger
through the wilderness to give note of our march.'
`Will you believe it? Their sudden disappearance led me to believe they
had only visited us as spies!'
`Sabatis gave me full evidence of his friendship to General Washington.'
`Well, it may be so. I heard an old Woodman say this afternoon that he
well knew that Sabatis, the Tarratine chief, was a friend of the English.'
`I may have been deceived. But if it is so he can do us no mischief in
what I have entrusted to him.'
`Not unless he improves your hint, and pushes forward himself to Quebec
to report us.'
Arnold started with surprise and vexation. `If they have done so, half
the fruit of our expedition will be lost!'
`It is a great inducement for an Indian chief to be bearer of such
intelligence
as he could carry. The reward would be great besides the favor it
would give him in the eyes of the English. Sabatis, too, can tell our foes
the exact amount of our force, and our condition.'
`If he has deceived me I cannot blame myself. Whether I trusted him
4
or not, if he was an enemy instead of a friend, it would have been the same
in the end. He came voluntarily into my tent, and offered his services. If
I had mistrusted him and sent him away he would still have had the same
information he has now, and made the same use of it; that is, if he has
proved treacherous. This I question! Though I must confess you have
aroused my suspicious. Ha, who approaches from the river?' be exclaimed
as the dog with a loud bark darted across the open space in front of the
house towards the entrance of the wood, through which a path-way led to
the shore. `Tell is a watchful sentinel, captain.' The house having a front
towards the road leading to the block-house, as well as a front facing the
river, a sentry was placed only on the East, on the road front of the
quarters
;
so that the side of the house on which the two officers were walking
was left unguarded, the two gentlemen having retired here after tea to walk
for its greater privacy, as well as for the beauty of the moonlit scene.
Opposite
rose dark and imposing a wooded height, at the base of which the
black transparent waters of the romantic Kennebis flowed past with arrowy
swiftness. The murmer of its passage among the rocks reaching their ears,
while the silvery sparkle of its broken waves gleamed through the trees.
Farther down, nearly a mile distant, was a plain, elevated a hundred feet
from the river, back of which towered a lofty hill, clad to its summit with
forest trees. On this plain, then just begining to yield its gigantic oaks to
the woodman's axe, now stands the beautiful city of Augusta, its dome and
towers and spires presenting to the eye a far different scene than that which
now met the gaze of the two officers. It was opposite this plain or table of
land that the block-house of Fort Weston stood, and the gleam of the fires
of the army in camp there, were reflected upon the opposite bank with a red
glare.
`It is two personsthey are Indians!' said Captain Morgan, taking a
second
glance at two figures issuing from the wood-land path. They stopped
near a small ledge of rock as the dog flew bounding and barking towards
them, and Neonah stepping before Willewa, presented his spear at the fierce
animal.
`Come away, Tell, come away!' cried his master. `They are but two,
and must be friendly,' he added addressing General Arnold. `Approach,
you have nothing to fear.'
Tell retired slowly before them, and the next moment Neonah and
Willewa
stood in the presence of the leader they had come to seek. Both
officers
were struck with the youth and appearance of the strangers, and
instantly
an interest was awakened in their breasts towards them.
`Whence came you?' demanded Arnold in English.
`From the forests of our people to seek the Great Sachem chief of the
Bostonees,' answered Willewa to his surprise, in the same language, though
brokenly.
`I am the Sachem you seek?'
`Then Great Father of the pale-faces, I am rewarded for all I have
undergone
,
in beholding your eyes and opening my lips that my words may fall
upon your ears! I have come to you, because I am the friend of the
Bostonees
!'
`The friends of the Bostonees are welcome. Who has sent you, my
brave youth, that you come to me!'
`No one has sent me but a grateful memory of thy people. Love for her
has sent me. For her sake I have come to warn thee of danger in thy path.
Know, great warrior-chief, that I have discovered that Canassa the
Nerijewec
has gathered his warriors together, and has in ambush a days journey
up the river waiting to cut off thy march. Whither thou wouldst proceed
I know, and for what end, for spies from thee have told it in the council
lodge of Canassa, and my ears heard. I have, therefore, come to tell thee
that the war-hatchet of the Nerijewec is unburied and that the bear prowls
in thy path!'
`This is news, Morgan, indeed! Noble youth you have our thanks, and
shall be rewarded. Of what tribe are you?'
`Of the tribe of Canassa,' answered Willewa hesitating.
`You have risked much then in coming to tell me this!'
`I have. All I ask is that, if Canassa should ever fall into thy power,
thou wilt release him for my sake!'
`It shall be done!'
`I have more to tell thee, chief. Natanis the brave chief of the
Abanaquies
is thy friend, even as Canassa is thy foe. He knows of the intentions
of Canassa, and is now assembling his warriors to throw himself at their
head between thee and Canassa, so that the former may be prevented from
doing that which he contemplates. Therefore, as thou goest on thy way up
the river, know that the warrior thou mayest find hovering around thy path
are friends who would protect and guard thee from danger. Thou wilt
know the chief of the Abanaquis by a scarlet plume in his coronet of black
feathers, and his warriors by their red bows and quivers, and scarlet belt of
wampum!'
`We shall not forget these tokens by which we are to recognise our
friends. Now what shall be thy reward for this intelligence?'
`Nothing, only that you give your word that you harm not Canassa!'
`I give the pledge, noble Indian youth!'
`It is enough! Good night!'
`Whither do you go? you must remain till morning. You must enter
and refresh yourselves, both of you,' said Captain Morgan.
No. We must return as we came. The great chief has heard all our
words!'
Thus speaking Willewa with a dignified yet graceful inclination of her
head, turned from the officers and followed by Neonab, disappeared in the
wood-land path by which they had ascended the river.
`This is surprising! two Indian lads thus acting as our friends, when their
tribe are foes to us!' said Arnold as they departed.
`There is something deeper in this than meets your eye,' said Captain
Morgan. `If that one who spoke so well in English is not a woman. then
I have no skill in detecting disguises. The truth is it is some chrrming
Indian
girl of Canassa's tribe who has a lover who is a friend to us, and so she
has done this in our behalf. From the manner in which she spoke of
Natanis
I should'nt wonder if he was the lover, and that she came from him.'
`It may be as you say, Morgan. But let us now see to improving this
news which is brought so opportunely.'
`I should like to see this Natanis, who is making this diversion in our
favor
,'
said Captain Morgan, as they passed round to the East front of the
house. `He must be a noble, generous fellow.'
`We can lose no time in getting the army in a condition to fight their
way tomorrow, if need be,' said Arnold; `will you accompany me to Fort
Weston? I am going there at once. I see your thoughts are upon that
handsome Indian boy, you choose to call a female!' said Arnold laughing.
`In truth I can't well get her out of my mind. All the time she was
talking
I was watching her perfectly formed features, and the lifting and falling
of her eye-lids, conscious that I was gazing upon a beautiful Indian maid,
who had chosen a male attire, doubtless to shield herself from rudeness if
she had met with any of the soldiers. I wish I knew all about this. There
is a romantic love affair at the bottom, I am convinced.'
`I see you are in love, my friend. If we fall in with Canassa, and he
takes you prisoner, perhaps we may have the little drama of Captain Smith
and Pocahontas acted over again!'
`I am afraid she has a lover already,' said the gallant rifleman smiling and
sighing; `if so I fear she would let my head go by the board. I would'nt
be willing to risk it. But here are our horses. As we can't take them in
the boats, this is likely the last time we shall be in the saddle until we get
into the Canadas.'
The two officers accompanied by three others who came out of the house
then mounted and galloping up the winding lane which led into the road,
turned to the right on reaching it, and rode rapidly at spur-speed in the
direction
of Fort Weston. After riding about a mile they came in sight from
a hill down which the road wound, of the block-house, and the square, log
fort in its rear, situated on a level point of land from which the trees had
been removed, leaving an extensive meadow washed by the river. In the
centre of it rose the dark walls of the block-house, an octagonal lantern
elevated
eight feet from the ground upon a square basis, looking not unlike, in
form, an ancient dove-cote, the resemblance to which its numerous little
windows for musket firing, contributed not a little to increase. On the
plain around it were encamped a thousand soldiers, some in shining tents;
others in wigwams constructed of green boughs, others in the open air
around a blazing fire. Upon a small green island just below the
block-house
white tents were also seen glimmering through the trees, adding to
the picturesque beauty of the whole scene.
The party paused a moment to survey the scene. The block-house was
ruddy with the numerous camp-fires; soldiers were passing to and fro in
the red light; groups were preparing their arms, others cooking food;
some in a merry mood were singing songs, and others stretched in their
blankets with their feet to the live-coals lay wrapped in sleep. Sentinels
were seen walking guard at regular intervals in the outer circle, and
between
them were filed stands of muskets gleaming in the moon-beams. Not
far from the walls of the fort were the lodges of several friendly Indians,
who were smoking their pipes in a circle around a fire. The shore was
lively with men arranging a long flotilla of batteaux, lading them and
getting
them ready for the morrow's march. At intervals, from a group of
trees on the spot where the toll-house now stands, to the ears of the
horsemen
rose bursts of martial music, the fife, drum and bugle mingling
together
in rude and wild melody.
Altogether, it was a striking and imposing sceue. After surveying it a
few moments, Arnold put spurs to his horse and dashed down towards the
block-house closely followed by his party of officers.
CHAPTER IX.
The Pursuit.
We
will now return to Ayane, whom, it will be remembered, Scarlet
Feather had left in his lodge on the banks of the Kennebis, with directions
to await the arrival of the seven warriors he was to send to join him for the
purpose of pursuing Sabatis and Sharp Knife.
The young brave, after the departure of Natanis, remained for sometime
seated upon the river side in front of the lodge dressing the shafts of a quiver
of arrows with the wing feathers of a hawk. While he was thus engaged
he would from time to time, with habitual watchfulness, raise his eyes and
take a keen, rapid survey about him, both of the river and the opposite
shores; for he knew he was very near foes. He whiled the time by
singing
,
or rather chanting in a low, musical tone of voice a song of passion.
The stars into the fountain's shine,
So Iska's eyes beam into mine;
The Cono warbles from the hill,
But Iska's voice is sweeter still;
The woodland fawn hath soft, brown eyes,
But timld from my footstep flies;
But Iska's eyes with browner bue
Lingering gate, while I pursue;
The rivers to the blue sea flow,
The mists from earth to heaven do go;
Iska is my own blue sea!
Iska is a heaven to me!
Iska is my own blue sea!
Iska is a heaven to me!'
While the lover was repeating the last two lines of his simple song in a
tone low and melodious, his quick ear detected a sound in the water, and,
looking round in the direction in which he heard it, he saw a canoe stealing
along the bank, and within a few yards of him. He saw that it contained
three Indians, who were standing up in the boat, one of them paddling it
along, dipping his thin-bladed paddle into the water with noiseless celerity.
A glance told Ayane that they were foes and Nerijewecs, for the moonlight
enabled him to see them with perfect distinctness. They were armed, and
watchful in their manner as they approached.
He was satisfied that he had not been seen, for a tree stood between him
and them; yet he was not sure that he had not been overheard. Ayane,
though young, was brave and cautions, as became a warrior of the
Abanaquis
race. He saw that the least movement would betray him, and it was
apparent to him that their object was to surprise the occupant of the lodge,
whoever he might be. He felt happy, then, at the reflection that his chief
was out of the danger which menaced him. He closely observed them,
while he planned for his own safety. He knew it would be yet six hours,
or near dawn before the braves Natanis was to despatch, could reach him;
he, therefore, had only his own arm and courage to depend upon. The
three Nerijewecs were stout warriors, and he felt that tact was more called
for now than valor. Grasping his spear firmly, he lay perfectly still in the
shadow of the huge trunk of the tree. The canoe came up within a bow's
length of the tree, and then touching the bank, the three warriors suddenly
leaped to the land, and, with a wild war-shout sprang towards the lodge,
their battle-axes elevated One of them rushed into it, and the others
placed
themselves before the door.
`No one is here! It is an Abanaquis lodge and here are the skins of the
game he has killed,' said the chief warrior of the party Canassa had
despatched
to seize the daring Abanaquis, who had the boldness to fix his
habitation
in sight of his own smokes.
Ayane did not wait to hear any more that was said, for no sooner had they
bounded towards the lodge, than he leaped into their canoe, and giving it a
strong impetus towards the middle of the stream, he let it take the current,
casting himself at full length in the bottom of the boat so as not to be seen
by them. This was all the act of an instant of time. The floating canoe
caught the eye of one of the Indians, and with a cry that their boat had got
adrift, he ran towards the bank. He was followed by another one of them,
and both at the same moment plunged into the river to swim towards it to
recover it.
When Ayane, who still continued to lay quietly in the bottom of the
canoe
,
was aware of their approach by their blowing and splashing in the
water
,
he loosened his war-hatchet in his belt, and grasped it firmly, and
awaited
the appearance of the first dark hand upon the side of the little bark.
He now saw that he could effectually escape them, and also destroy them.
By taking to the canoe, he had only hoped to be carried safely by the
current
far out of sight before they discovered the absence of their boat.
Suddenly an arm was thrown above the water, and the hand seized the
side of the canoe. Ayane instantly elenched it firmly in his, and rising up,
struck the warrior a heavy blow in the temples! He sunk like a stone
beneath
the surface, and the sharp edge of the tomahawk the next moment
descended upon the hand of his companion, who, with a fierce cry had
taken
hold of the canoe to upset it. The bleeding limb fell into the boat,
while the Indian, diving deep, avoided the fatal stroke that was descending
upon his head. As he rose to the surface, he directed his course towards
the opposite shore, leaving a dark red track behind as he swam.
`Two of you I am at least free from,' said the young victor; `now for
the third! He is but one, and an Abanaquis is not to fly from a single
warrior
,
and he a Nerijewec.'
With this haughty expression Ayane directed the head of the canoe
towards
the bank on which the remaining brave was standing, watching his
approach. As he came near, the tomahawk of the Nerijewec came flying
through the whizzing air, and passed harmlessly above his head as he
stooped
to avoid it. The next moment, the two antagonists were engaged hand
to hand in the water mid-waist deep, Ayane having leaped from the canoe
to attack him! Their only weapons were their hunting-knives, for Ayane
had sent his war-batchet at his foe, in answer to the message of his own.
The struggle was fierce, and very equal, but at length Ayane obtained the
victory over his more powerful antagonist, and his body sinking beneath the
waves, was borne away by the swift tide.
The young brave now found that he was slightly wounded in the shoulder
and he entered the lodge to dress it. On the floor he found a Nerijewec
spear, quiver and bow, and on the outside, a bear's-skin, a coronet of
feathers
,
and other costume which the two warriors had thrown aside, before
springing into the river. These he carefully gathered and bound up as
trophies
of his victory.
It was just dawn of day when Ayane, rising from the ground upon which
he had cast himself late the night before, went out from the lodge, The
gray light of morning was just streaking the East. He turned from it to
penetrate with his eyes the forests south of the lodge, from whence he
expected
the party Natanis was to send.
If they come not by sunrise I shall pursue these spies, and arrest them
prisoners alone,' he said with resolution. `Each moment lessens the chance
of overtaking them. They have full ten hours start! Ah! there are my
braves!' he exclaimed with joy as he saw, one after another, seven
Abanaquies
warriors in their scarlet belts, and bows and quivers of the same bright
hue, issue from the wood in single file, one after the other, and, at a swift,
running trot, advance towards him. He met them half way, and, after
interchanging
a few words with each, he placed himself at their head, and
leaving the lodge to the right, struck a trail above it near the river bank, and
with his party, was soon lost to sight in the shadows of the forest glades.
He had been departed but a few minutes, when a canoe left the opposite
shore, and as it emerged from the obscurity of the shadows which the gray
morning still enveloped the river, it was seen to contain two persons. As
they came nearer, they proved to be Neona and Willewa, the latter in the
male attire, with which two evenings afterwards we have seen her appear
before General Arnold. They now landed in front of the lodge and after
vigilant circumspection of its vicinity, Willewa timidly advanced towards it
and entered it.
`Now, Neonah, hasten with the speed of the deer with thy message,' said
the maiden. To night, you will find me awaiting your return at the Rock
of the silver spring. Thou knowest it is two of the Bostonee leagues
below
.
From thence we will together proceed on our mission to the great
Sachem chief of the Pale faces. Fly! Say to Natanis if he loves Willewa
never to approach again her lodge, nor enter the hunting-grounds of
Canassa
.
Say to her that I will send him word by thee when we can safely
meet. Tell him that Canassa with his warriors is on his march to intercept
the Bostonees at the rapids of the Teton, filling the forests with eyes to
await
the issue of the warlike movements of Canassa. But, 'she added with
emphasis, `see that Natanis gives thee for me his promise as a warrior and
a chief that he will no more seek Willewa in the lodges of her people.'
Neonah then departed from her with the speed of a grey-hound, and
disappeared
in the direction by which the warriors of Natanis less than half
an hour before had come to join Ayane.
`Only in this way can Natanis avert my fathers' anger. Were he to
come, at last, rather would Willewa perish by the fire, or by the war-hatchet
than to betray him. No, Natanis, noble and brave! Thou hast the heart
and love of a true maiden, who, rather than harm should come to thee would
forget that the blood of the Nerijewec's flowed in her veins, and join
herself
to the Abanaquis, heart and hand. Yet in loving Natanis so much as
I do, I love not my father less! He is still my father, and as such
commands
my love and duty. Yet to these I cannot sacrifice Natanis! Oh!
that I could love both, without doing the other a wrong! Ah! here is upon
the ground a silver ring! It was worn by Ayane! Can he have been here
since Natanis left? Some one has been in the lodge! If it had been those
warriors my father sent, they would have destroyed it by fire. They at least
have not been here. Ah! what do you here, Ustaloga?' she asked,
surprised
at seeing a Nerijewec warrior approach her. Her right arm was folded
beneath his hunting shirt of skins, and he looked pale and suffering. It
was the Indian whose hand Ayane had severed, and who, having from the
other shore seen his departure with the dawn, had now crossed the river by
swimming, on seeing Willewa approach the lodge. In a few indignant
words he told her all that had transpired. Willewa was not a little
surprised
at the narration; and wondered whither Ayane could have gone; for
she yet knew nothing of the two spies.
`Will Ustaloga go back to the lodges of his tribe?' asked Willewa, who
trembled lest he might inform Canassa of her presence there at the lodge of
the Abanaquis. `Will he not rather fear the wrath of his chief, that he has
let a youth thus overcome him and two braves?' Let the warrior-with-one
hand seek the tribes of the Keewods, for they are women.'
`Ustaloga will no more see the face of Canassa! Ustaloga is now a child,
a womanand no brave. The hand of his war-hatchet is in the dark waves
of the Kennebis! The blood of his war-heart hath flowed out, and his
spirit is dead! Ustaloga no more can dart the hunting-spear, or bend the
bow at his foe! No more will he whirl the war-hatchet at his enemy, or
join in the buttle cry with his braves! Ustaloga is no more than a woman
in the lodges of his people! Ustaloga will die and go to the
Huntinggrounds
of his father! In the land of the Great Spirit will he become a
warrior!'
As the mained warrior thus gloomily, and in a solemn tone sung his
death-song, he approached the banks of the river, and slowly walked out
into its current. As his footsteps descended deeper and deeper upon the
bottom, he continued thus chanting his lament:
`The dark waters flow on! and as they flow, they open their bosom that
Ustaloga may lie down in their embrace! Deep, deep rush the waves of
Kennebis! Cold, cold are the waves of Kennebis! But deeper are the
wounds in the spirit of the warrior! Colder the war-fire in his veins! Dark,
dark sweep the waters of the Kennebis; but darker rush the thoughts of
Ustaloga over his soul. The Hunting grounds of my tribe will soon
disappear
from my eyes, but they will open upon the green woods of the
Spirit-land
!
Thus ends the death-song of Ustaloga! Thus dies the unhappy
brave that no longer may live with warriors and men! Once more will I
shout the war-cry of my tribe, and amid its echoes fly to the hunting
grounds of the sun!'
The unhappy warrior then raised his voice in the shrill battle-cry of his
war-like tribe, and while it was reverberating through the forests on either
bank plunged beneath the surface!
Long, long did Willewa, awed by the sad scene she had witaessed, gaze
upon the black waters. But the warrior rose no more to the surface; and
she turned away and wept his fate; for Ustaloga was a brave and faithful
warrior, and one whom she had known as Canassa's trusty friend and
counsellor
since she was a child.
In a little while afterwards she left the lodge, after taking with her a small
scarlet feather as a memento of her lover, and which had probably fallen
from his head. Entering her boat, she descended the river to the place
appointed, to meet Neonah. Here she remained during the day. Just
before
sun-set the youth appeared, and reported that he had seen Natanis, and
delivered her messages, and that Natanis had promised faithfully to be
governed
by her wishes. Neonah informed her that he saw Willewa at the
head of his assembled warriors, and that as he left him, he was on the eve
of his departure to throw himself between Canassa and the Bostonee
army.
The same night, as soon as the light of the moon rendered it safe,
Willewa
embarked with her youthful cousin in the canoe, and continued down
the river till day-light. They secreted themselves and their little vessel
during
the day, for they knew the shores were traversed by war-parties, and
again embarked at evening. We have seen how, after sailing on this second
evening two hours, they reached the Cushnoc rapids, and landed at the camp
of the American General.
We will now return to Ayane and his brave band of seven young braves.
He steadily pursued his couse along the shores of the river scarcely
pausing
to rest, until the sun began to descend in the bosom of the western hills.
They had closely examined every nook that might conceal a canoe as they
passed up, and when the day closed, Ayane was satisfied that those whom
they sought, were still in advance of them. It was twilight when he came
in sight of a carrying-place; a spot where the framing water rendered it
necessary that every ascending boat should be borne around it, on the land.
On reaching this place, Ayane carefully examined the shore, and at length
discovered the print of footsteps. He followed them, and saw that two
persons had walked around the rapids, and he knew by the depth of the
pressure in the soil that they must have borne a boat upon their
shoulders'
Filled with joy at this discovery, be followed the trail, and discovered
where it again was lost in the water above the rocks. From its appearance
he was assured that it could not have been an hour since they had passed
along.
He now took his way up the shore at a swift pace, carefully watching the
river; and as the shades of night fell over it, enveloping the banks in gloom,
he made use of his ears instead of his eyes, stopping at frequent intervals
to listen to catch the sound of a paddle. He traveled at the head of his
young warriors in this way about two hours, confident of being able soon
to overtake those he was pursuing, knowing he had moved much faster than
they could in a canoe, when he heard, from a small island just above him, a
rushing noise, followed by a plunge into the water. Then came a deer
swimming towards them, but was borne by the current swiftly past, ere he
reached the bank.
`That deer has flown from the presence of man,' said Ayane. `Now, my
braves, our prize is certain. Those we seek cannot be far above the island.
They have disturbed this deer in passing; or else have landed upon it. Now
be guided by me in all your movements. The least impetuosity will
prevent
their capture.'
Ayane then kept on until they came opposite the island. He then
stopped
to listen. A sound reached his ear like the clicking of a flint struck
upon steel. His keen eye at the same moment detected amid the dark
foliage
of the island, sparks flying, and then he saw a deep glow like a
glow-worm
,
emitting beams of light.
Instantly he arrested the advance of his warriors, and said, in a low
tone,
`They are there upon the island! They have landed, and are smoking their
pipes. They must be the spies. See, there are but two pipe fires visible.
There are but two men! But we must be as cautious as if there were ten;
for we must surprise them. It is the command of Natanis that no harm
be done them.'
Ayane then chose three of his party by name to accompany him, leaving
the others to watch the river, lest, possibly, taking alarm, the spies might
escape by water. He then entered the forest, and keeping along under its
covert till he had got some distance above the island, he threw aside his
robe of deer skins, and noiselessly dropped from a branch into the stream.
He was followed by the other three, and in silence they began to swim
towards
the head of the island. They soon reached it, landing under the
protection of an overhanging oak. With the tread of the velvet-footed pard
when he creeps upon his prey, they then moved towards the spot where he
saw the pipe-fires glowing up at every whiff of the smokers. At length,
guarded by trees, they came so near them that Ayane could clearly see by
the glare of the light given by their pipes upon their features, that one of
them was a white-hunter, and the other, the Sagamore Sabatis. The face
of Sharp Knife he had never seen before, but that of the Chief he
recognized
.
The two spies were talking together, and Sharp Knife was
congratulating
his companion upon the rapid progress they had made. In the
meanwhile
,
Ayane having addressed a few words of direction to his braves, crept
with them round so as to get behind their backs. The four then laid down
and drew themselves along the ground like caterpillars until within ten feet
of them. Then Ayane sprang to his feet, shouted the war-cry of the
Abanaquis
,
and with one of his braves, leaped upon Sabatis as he sat upon the
ground. Sharp Knife was at the same moment in the grasp of the two
others
,
each with a knife elevated above his heart.
Both of the spies struggled fierecely to throw off their captors, in vain.
Ayane and his friends had the advantage in the outset, and after a few
moments
,
succeeded in subduing them, and binding them with cords of deer's
hide. They were then conveyed into the canoe, and taken to the shore
where the other warriors were left, and the whole party began to move
down the river, part on the shore, and Ayane and one warrior in the canoe
with his two sullen and ferocious prisoners; for the knowledge that they
had been seized by the command of Scarlet Feather, was not calculated to
lessen the chagrin with which they contemplated this unexpected
termination
of their mission.
CHAPTER X.
The Two War Chiefs.
As Neonah and Willewa, after their departure from the head-quarters of
the American General, were paddling their light skiff along under the
covert
of the bank on the East side of the river which lay most in shadow from
the moon-beams, they were suddenly startled by the whizzing of an arrow
through the air above their heads. It came from the opposite shore, and
ere they could discover from whom, a second one came humming and
struck in the side of the canoe, penetrating to its feathers through the thin
plates of birehen bark.
`An enemy!' cried Neonah, turning the prow of the boat so as to place
himself in a line between Willewa and the danger.
`No. It is an Abanaquis shaft,' said Willewa as she bent down to
examine
it.
`The Abanaquies are our foes!' answered Neonah with warmth.
This was true enough, thought Willewa; but she so loved their young
chief that she had forgotten that the nation itself was hostile to her own.
`See, upon the bank are three warriors! One of them waves his spear.
He shouts to us!'
`Foe or friend, turn your canoe hither or a flight of arrows will be shot
instead of a single one!'
`It is the voice of Natanis! I thought I recognized his noble figure
conspicuous
above those around him!' said the maiden with joy. `Direct the
course towards them!'
`They will make you prisoner!' cried Neonah with emphasis.
`I am willing to be prisoner to Natanis,' she said smiling. `Hast thou
forgotten the tale I told thee?'
`No,' answered Neonah sullenly. `But I like not this chief loving thee
so well, cousin. If we meet in fair battle I will deal the death upon his
proud head!'
`Nay, Natanis is my friend!'
`That is why he is my enemy!'
`Neonah, this is folly. See! they bend their bows again from the banks.
We obey you, Natanis!' she cried waving her hand. The jealous youth
made no effort to urge the boat towards the bank, on which a group of at
least a score of warriors were now assembled, all distinctly visible in the
moonlight, for the river here was not more than six hundred feet wide.
But Willewa plied her paddle with grace and skill, and no little power, and
the canoe soon touched the bank. Natanis met the disguised Willewa as
she sprang upon the green sward.
`How is this? Who are you, youth? Surely I heard a maiden's voice?'
`Come hither, chief, and I will tell thee whose it was!' she said
unwilling
to betray herself before his warriors.
`Art thou not a lad of Canassa's tribe?'
`I am, noble chief! Yet I know that Natanis is the friend of Canassa!'
`Dost thou? Who knows this but one!'
`Nay, stand aside with me, chief. Now,' she said, as Natanis stepped a
little way after her, and they stood apart from the rest; `will I tell thee!'
`Has the princess Willewa a brother. Art thou not a son of Canassa?'
`I am a daughter of Canassa. Dost thou not recognize the voice of
Willewa
?'
Natanis uttered an exclamation of astonishment, and was about to embrace
her with joyful surprise when he was restrained in the impulse by a motion
of her finger. She then told him why she had so disguised herself, and of
her visit to the American camp. He listened, and when she had done he
looked troubled and was silent.
`I have displeased thee, Natanis.'
`No; thou hast done well and nobly, Willewa. But I would thou hadst
not gone to the camp.'
`My disguise was not penetrated. I was treated as a youth, even as
Neonah
was!'
`Thou art brave and true, Willewa. Now have I somewhat to tell thee.
But first I must hold thee as my prisoner. I shall not suffer you to return
to your lodge. You and your cousin I shall keep with me, for I hope soon
to add to your companionship Canassa himself!'
`Take my father prisoner?'
`Hear my words, Willewa,' he said, tenderly. I will do nothing that you
will not counsel. Canassa with his warriors has thrown himself into the
pass of the Sebasticook, at the point where the Bostonees have felled trees
to erect a block-house; having made prisoners of the party of men the chief
Arnold sent forward to build it. He there lays in wait to fall upon the
Bostonee
army. This ambuscade you have prepared their war-chief to watch
for and guard against. But Canassa will attack him, if not there at some
other point, unless I and my warriors interfere. This we cannot do
without
a battle!'
`Oh, let not Canassa and Natanis meet in the fight!' cried Willewa
earnestly
.
`For thy sake, Willewa, I will avoid the contest he would force upon me.
There is only one way in which this can be prevented, and also the
Bostonee
army saved from ruin!'
`How, Natanis?' she tremblingly asked.
`By making Canassa prisoner!'
`My father thy prisoner?'
`Yes, Willewa. I have learned by a spy that his war lodge is planted on
the extremity of the point of land formed by the Kennebis and Sebasticook,
and that he has with him only eight chiefs, the party occupying three lodges.
The main body of his warriors are encamped in the wood on both sides of
the lesser stream, and some six hundred yards above him. Now when I
heard this I resolved to make an attempt to seize the person of Canassa.
Once in my power I could induce him to order his warriors back to their
lodges, and bring about also terms of reconciliation between me and him.
Now that I have met you, if you will consent to my plan to save blood-shed
I have no doubt that your father might also be led to give his consent to our
marriage.'
`Not by first making him your foe by making him your prisoner,
Natanis
.'
`He is my foe now. Once in my hands I can bring him to terms of
conciliation
and peace. Besides I intend to be aided by the Bostonee chief.
But all my plan I cannot now detail. But will you trust to the wisdom and
love of Natanis? and let me do that I think best for Canassa, for myself and
for thee!'
The maiden remained silent and thoughtful for a few moments, and then
taking one of his hands in hers, said:
`Natanis, it is a struggle in my heart between thee and my father. But I
yield. I know that thou wilt do that which is wise and good. But how
wilt thou be able to seize Canassa, sorrounded by his eight warriors,
without
blood being shed. Alas, I tremble, Natanis.'
`Thy father's blood should be saved, though he struck down seven of my
own braves.'
`Blood must not be shed, Natanis. As you say, if Canassa can be taken
prisoner, the attack upon the Bostonees may be prevented, and a battle
between
you and him in their defence also avoided. I will prove my love to
thee Natanis, as well as my tenderness for the life of Canassa; though my
heart shrinks at the thought of what I dare to do to save the lives of many
warriors of the Abanaquies, the Nerijewees, and the Bostonees! From
here to where Canassa encamps, is less than a league. Let me proceed on
my way in the canoe with Neonah. I will visit him at his lodge. I will
not tell him that it was through me, nor that I assumed this disguise, but to
seek him alone. I must deceive him, Natanis, to save him from doing evil,
and from meeting in arms with thee. I will walk with him along the river
banks as we discourse together, and when thou shalt see a fit time, fall upon
us, and make prisoners of us both. I will be to thee as a youth, and as such
you must suppose me, and treat me; thus my father will not suspect my
unfilial
conspiracy against him; but a conspiracy undertaken in benevolence
and kindness. If I err, may the Great Spirit pardon my error.'
About two hours later than this conversation took place, Canassa and an
Indian youth were promenading side by side upon a level plateau of sward
upon the shore of the Kennebis
*
*
The Point on which stands now, the block house at Winslow. We will mention here, that
the citizens of Waterville and Winslow are about to purchase this relic with the intention of
preserving
it. This is a praiseworthy spirit.
Before them mingled the waters of the
two rivers, and in one bright mirror, swept proudly away to the southward,
losing itself among the overhanging hills.
`Chief, you are my prisoner!' cried the voice of Natanis at his ear.
Four warriors instantly threw themselves upon him and bound him, while
Natanis pressed his hand upon his mouth, to prevent his giving the alarm.
Willewa was then seized by the Chief, and the two prisoners were rapidly
borne alone the shore a few rods, and placed in a canoe which crossed the
river with them, followed by two others, containing the rest of the
Abanaaquis
party. This prompt and successful issue of his plot, not a little
gratified
the young Abanaquis. During the whole time Canassa had not moved.
He sat in the canoe stern and silent, a warrior standing before and behind
him with uplifted knives, threatening him with instant death if he raised
his voice; and finding himself completely in their power, he refused to
compromit
his savage dignity by making any efforts that could not be successful
towards freeing himself from his captors. Willewa sat near him weeping,
for she grieved to see her noble father thus bound; but she was upborne in
her heart by the consciousness that it was an act of duty which she had
been a party to. Let those blame her who have thus a heart divided
between
a lover and a father, with equal love for both; and who hopes from
the step, to secure peace and safety to friends, and consent for her union
with him whom her heart has chosen for its mate.
Conclusion
There
is, on the East bank of the Kennebee about a third of a mile above
the toll-bridge a conical-shaped hill called `Cushnoc mount.' It rises about
seventy
feet above the plateau or meadow. At the base of the mound, close at its
foot is a private cemetery, dark and funereal with fur and cypress, whose deep
shades cast at noon-day a tranquil twilight down upon its avenue a tomb! one
of those quiet spots on which the living gaze with a feeling of envy, when they
reflect how calmly the dead rest there.
It was on the summit of this mound, which then rose from the bosom of a
forest of noble oaks, scarce one of which has been left by the ruthless axe, that
the morning after the capture of Canassa, Natanis planted his council-lodge. It
commanded a view of the American army below, and of the river for a long
distance both north and south. The sun had been up two hours. The
American
army was already in motion in its fleet of batteaux. Arnold and his suite
were awaiting the embarkation of the last division when a young Indian came
and presented himself before him as he stood in the north door of the timber
foot. It was Ayane. In his hand he carried a roll of scarlet wampum which
he presented to the American leader.
`It is an Abanaquis!' said Captain Morgan. `Send the interpreter here? He
has something to say.'
A half Indian of the Kennebis tribe dressed like a hunter came up and
interpreted
the words of Ayane. They were as follows:
`Great War-Chief, Natanis the chief of the Abanaquis sends me to thee. He
encamps with twenty of his warriors not far hence. He would see the father
of the Bostonee braves, and hold council with him; for he has much in his heart
to say; and Natanis is the friend of the Bostonee.'
`That is true!' said General Arnold.
After a brief consultation with his officers, they mounted their horses and
galloped along the river shore towards the lodge of the Abanaquis. On seeing
them, Natanis went forth to meet them, descending the hill. They were struck
by the manly beauty of his person, and the dignity of his manner.
`Great war chief of the Bostonee, welcome. I have sought thy camp to hold
council with thee.'
`We know Natanis is our friend!' answered Arnold alighting and taking him
by the hand. `A youth came to us and spoke of thee as such and warmly to.'
Natanis felt his face glow at this speech, and a moment after said,
`Noble Bostonee, I and my braves are thy friends! I heard that Canassa the
powerful Nerijewec would have way-laid thee, and attempted to stop the
progress
of thy army. I marched with my warriors to prevent him; but by
stratagem
I have taken him prisoner! therefore, from his tribe you can fear nothing.'
`Canassa our prisoner!' exclaimed Arnold.
`
Mine
not
thine
, Bostonee! know that the daughter of Canassa is my
betrothed
bride. For her sake I forebore engaging him in buttle, and plotted to defeat
his purpose against you by seizing his person.
`You have acted like a brave warrior and true friend, noble Natanis! where
is thy prisoner?'
`I have more to say. By chance I fell in with two spies, one of them the
chief Sabatis and his friend Sharp-Knife. They were, I discovered from their
words, hastening on their way to carry intelligence of your advance to the
English
at Quebec. As I knew that such intelligence would materially affect your
expedition, I despatched seven of my warriors to arrest them. They pursued
them many hours, and at length came upon them, surprised, and took them
prisoners
.
Thus, with the two chiefs of the only tribes hostile to you, in your
power
,
you have no fear of molestation.'
`Thou art a true friend to us, as well as a brave warrior, Abanaquis!
exclaimed
Arnold with admiration. `The service you have done us is incalculable.'
`Sabatis, I had my suspicions of from the first,' said Capt. Morgan after
warmly
expressing to Natanis his sense of his services. `I knew he was a friend to
the English.'
`How can we reward such services as these, noble Chief?'
`I ask that Canassa and Sabatis and Sharp Knife be at my disposal after you
have seen them, and your eyes have told you that my words are true.'
`They are yours to do with as you list. Hast thou another favor?'
`I have, Chief,' answered Natanis coloring with modest embarrassment.
`Name it.'
`I have told thee that the daughter of Canassa is betrothed to me. I would
have you see him, and as he speaks English well, state to him my wish to marry
her. Make his freedom (as if he were your own captive) depend on his
consent
.
Show him the advantages of a union of our tribes; and use such other
arguments as you may deem wise and to the purpose.'
`Let me manage this affair, General,' said Capt. Morgan. `It is a
love-matter
,
and in such things I am quite at home. But, first, tell me, noble Natanis,
was not the messenger lad who came to us, the maiden in question? Nay, you
need not say yes, for I see it is so, in your confoundedly handsome eyes.'
Natanis smiled and conducted the American officers to one of the Lodges,
upon the mound in which sat Canassa stern and majestic in his bonds. He
haughtily and with a look of defiance, acknowledged the salutation of General
Arnold.
`If the great war-chiefs blue-eyed brave will talk with Canassa,' said Natanis
to Arnold, glancing his eyes earnestly towards Capt Morgan, I will now conduct
thee to Sabatis.'
`Sabatis should be given up to me, Natanis,' said Arnold as he quitted the
lodge, leaving Morgan alone with the captive chief of the Nerijewecs.
`Sabatis is the brother of Natanis,' answered the young warrior.
`Thy brotherdost thou mean sons of the same mother?'
`I do, chief of the Pale-faced warriors. In taking him prisoner I have
thereby
shown my love for the Bostonee.'
`You have, indeed,' answered General Arnold, struck with this Roman
greatness
of conduct. `Sabatis and thy other prisoners are thine to do with, as seems
good to you. I can confide in your honor and faith.'
`It shall be my endeavor to reconcile my brother to the Bostonee. If he
refuses
,
he shall remain my prisoner until you are safe through the wilderness.
His person and that of Canassa I shall hold ash ostages for the good conduct o
their tribes.'
Some further conversation took place beyond hearing of the two captives,
who, silent and full of revenge against their chivalrous young captor stood, each
apart from the other, in a corner of the lodge, Sabatis walking backward and
forward, his arms pinioned behind him, looking like a native lion of the forest
chafing under his bonds.
While Natanis and Arnold were thus conversing outside of the lodge, Capt.
Morgan approached the former with a countenance animated with hope.
`Chief, Canassa would speak with thee.'
`Hast thou been successful, Morgan?' demanded Arnold.
`Come and see!' he replied smiling.
When Natanis entered the lodge in which Canassa was, the latter rose up and
said,
`Young warrior, chief of the Abanaquis, I have heard the white, blue-eyed
chief's words. They are good! Canassa will be at peace with the Bostonee.
Canassa will also seek peace with the Abanaquis. Dost thou love the daughter
of Canassa?'
`As I love the light of the sun, great chief, answered Natanis.
`That she loves thee, I know. Be then united, and in your union bless our
tribes long hostile. United, when I am gone reign over the Abanaquis and
Nerijewecs; henceforth let us be at peace. We have sprung from one father,
let us be brethren Lest thou shouldst suppose I have yielded to bribery from
this blue-eyed chief, know Natanis that thou hast had an eloquent and
successful
pleader for thee here. Come forth, my daughter?'
As he spoke he raised a curtain that divided the back part of the lodge from
an inner enclosure, and blushing and with downcast eyes, Willewa appeared
before
them. She was dressed in her graceful female costume, which Neonah had
gone for to her lodge after she had left him in the boat to execute her stratagem
upon her father.
`Willewa,' said the chief, `I now fulfil my promise to thee, made last night,
that if Natanis asked thy hand of me in marriage it should be his; for thou
lovest
him!'
The Chief then took her hand in his and looking at Natanis, said with
dignity
`approach
Abanaquis!'
`First be thou made free, noble Canassa,' cried the surprised and happy young
chief, severing at a single blow the bonds which crossed the majestic chest of
the noble old warrior.
Canassa then placed her trembling hand in that of her lover, and said with
solemnity
and tenderness,
`May the Great Spirit smile on you both, my children, and make you rulers
of a mighty nation!'
Natanis gracefully embraced his bride-elect, while Captain Morgan
exclaimed
with warmth,
`Didn't I say that handsome Indian lad was a woman?'
`I will yield to you, Captain, after this in such matters,' said General
Arnold
,
smiling.
`But confound the old chief! I thought all the while I had brought this
happy thing about so nicely all by my own glibness of speech. And after
it all it is the work of this dark gazelle-eyed little nut-brown beauty, who
looks as happy as a robin on a sunny spring morning. Well, they are a
noble
pair, and would grace any court in Europe. But where is our Chaplain?
Let us have them married on the spot!'
After some hesitation on the part of Willewa, when this was suggested to
her, her consent was blushingly given, and the Chaplain was sent for. The
ceremony took place on the level area upon the summit of the mound
before
the lodge, in which Canassa had been captive. Ayane stood by the
side of his chief, and an Indian maid beside Willewa. Sabatis and Sharp
Knife, were surprised witnesses of this reconciliation between the two rival
chieftains, and the former felt that his power and influence were now gone
among the tribes of the East. When the ceremony was concluded, Ayane
took by the hand the Indian maiden who had stood up with Willewa, and
being conducted before the Chaplain by Natanis, they also were united in
marriage. Neonah was not present; and when Willewa looked for him to
receive his congratulations, she beheld him flying along the river path
towards
the rapids with the wild speed of a deer. He paused an instant as he
reached a rock upon the verge, then turning towards his lovely mistress,
whom in the silence of his young heart he had deeply and purely loved, he
waved his hand in farewell, and plunged into the vortex of waters which
closed upon him forever.
In an hour after these events, the whole army commenced its ascent of
the river in batteaux, and after five weeks of the greatest hardship and
perseverance
they at length reached and made an attack upon the citadel of
Quebec. The result is matter of history; upon which, as a novelist, we
shall not presume to intrude.
*
*
For the best narrative of this expedition the reader is referred to Sparks` Life of Arnold.
Sabatis, subsequently released, visited
Governor
Carlton at Quebec; but not receiving that reward which his faithful
adherence to the British cause merited, he retired to his forests in grief and
disgust, and there died after having outlived nearly all his tribe, and seen
the once haughty power of the Abanaquies fall before the sweeping scythe
of civilization.
[We cannot take leave of our readers without acknowledging our
obligations
to William B. Hartwell, Esq., of the Secretary of States' Office,
Augusta
,
Maine, for access to documents, and for many valuable facts and
suggestions
bearing upon the events upon which our story is founded.]
THE END.
Ayane severing the hand from a Nerijewic.
[See p.55.